 
 
If Hitler had been smart, would Germany have won?
 
 
I'm hoping some of the students of history here can answer this. I certainly don't know much about the subject myself, but on war documentaries I've seen, there seemed to be what appeared even to me to be glaring blunders. Like almost having Moscow in sight, and then making a right turn (can't remember where he turned to). Did it give the Russians time to dig in? I'm sure there are other instances.
 
 
Hitler was not, in military terms, smart. Politically, he was very savvy, and correctly judged the will of the pre-war English and French governments to honor their commitments to Poland. Militarily, he was an idiot, and it cost Germany dearly.

As for Moscow, taking the city would not have put old Joe Stalin out of business. At any event, the Japanese were ostensibly his allies, but they had nevertheless concluded an armistice with the Soviet Union to end their conflict on the east asian mainland. I've read various figures, but i would say it not unreasonable that the end of the undeclared war with Japan freed about 40 divisions which were transferred to the west. Hitler, idiot he, declared war on the United States after Pearl Harbor, which played right into Roosevelt's hand, as he had always wanted to make war in Europe the focus of American efforts.

I heard an interview with a gentleman named Montefiori on NPR (National Public Radio) yesterday. He has written a book about Stalin. I don't recall the full title, but the subtitle is The Court of the Red Tsar. He claims it is based on documents from the Soviet era which the Russians have now made public. It was his contention in the interview that Stalin had thought that Hilter, being a smart politician, was as intelligent as was he, Stalin. He had thoroughly read up on Bismark and Von Moltke when Hitler had come to power, and was convinced that Hitler would not attempt to fight a war on two fronts at the same time. The author contends that Stalin thought that Hitler would finish off Britain first, before turning east. Stalin was therefore expecting an invasion in about 1943, rather than 1941. The Soviet Union had been deadlocked with Japan, and had recently been humiliated in an attempt to invade Finnland. Stalin had then committed nearly all of his efficient, mobile resources to the war with Finnland. When Hitler struck, the Russians were somewhat caught off guard, but not entirely unprepared.

Hitler's stupidity was such that no provisions were made in the original invasion for a winter campaign. Hitler's assumption that terror bombing would be effective militarily ought to have been disproven to him in the bombing of Warsaw, but he was militarily stupid, and addicted to the excellence of his own opinion. It had no effect of Britain, other than to harden British resolve. It had no effect on the Russians, who, as throughout most of their history, feared the enemy behind them far more than the enemy to their front.
 
 
By the way, the answer to your titular question is no.

If Hitler had been smart, he would not have invaded the Soviet Union while he already had a serious shooting war on his hands. He was committed in Norway, in North Africa and in the occupation of France, and had major assets stationed in the Pas de Calais.

Hitler was an idiot.
 
 
I was kinda hoping you'd come along Set.
 
 
Depends what you mean by "win".
Setanta is right from his aspect.
But if we look on that on "lower" levels, Germany would've won. If Hitler was smart enough Austria, large part of former Czechoslovakia and probably even large parts of Poland would be German today.
I mean, it's impossible to say actually what would be TODAY, but back then he already had Austria and parts of ex Czechoslovakia with silent agreement of UK and France, and he would probably manage to take some parts of Poland.
He wanted too much though.
 
 
 
He wanted too much though.
 

Have to assume that he wanted it ALL.
 
 
There is a relatively brief book, Wilso, which sheds some light on what the German military thought. In English, the title is The First and the Last. It is the war memoir of Adolf Galland, who ended the war as the commander of the Luftwaffe fighter arm. He was highly critical of Hitler's stupid obsession with bombers. In on passage, Galland details his plans which kept 50 fighters in the air over the English channel at all times, allowing the German battleships Scharnhorst and Gneisenau and the battle cruiser Prinz Eugen to run the English channel in broad daylight, and thereby transfer from the French coast of the Bay of Biscay, where they were very vulnerable, and to make it safely to the Keil canal. Compare that the situation on June 6, 1944--D Day. In all of France, the Germans flew 160 sorties (a sorty is one plane flying one mission). By contrast, the allies flew more than 14,000 sorties over Normandy alone (i.e., a plane would fly its mission and return, would be re-fueled and re-armed, and a new pilot or aircrew would immediately take off for another sorty). Exactly two of the German sorties were over the invasion beaches proper.

In The Rommel Papers, edited by B. H. Liddell-Hart and Rommel's widow, Rommel insists that German resources must be immediately behind the invasion beaches. He contended that the Germans would never be able to make the approach march to the combat zone because of allied air superiority. He based this upon his experience in Egypt against Monty and the Eighth army. The English kept just 24 bombers in the air, but kept that number in the air around the clock. Basically, when Monty launched his attack, the Afrika Korps and their Italian allies were obliged to march on foot away from the battlefield, because no vehicle could survive on the roads. Monty sent the New Zealanders against Rommels strongest "defense in depth" position, and the initial slaughter of the Kiwis was horrible. But the Germans could not hold the position, and could not effectively counter attack because of English air power. Rommel predicted that the policy of keeping the armored divisions in the interior of France to await some big decisive battle in the interior was tantamount to military suicide. Sycophantic officers at OKW pandered to Hitler's vision, however, and even Rommels immediate superior, Von Ruhnstedt (sp?) subscribed to this theory, although he was a hard-headed realist who was unafraid of contradicting Hitler. Rommel was proven correct. He had landed in Africa with the 5th Light Division, which had been converted into the 21st Panzer. On D-Day, the 21st Panzer, by then in France, was stationed on the road leading southeast away from Caen, over a distance of about 20 kilometers. It took three days to assemble the division, which had by that time lost more than half of its mechanized assets. The 6th Falschirmjaeger (sp?--it means parachute light infantry, and among Germany's best infantry) was 60 k. away from the invasion beaches in Brittany. It required a week to assemble this brigade in Normandy--they had to march on foot, and could only do so during the brief summer night of northern Europe. Rommel was proven, saddly from the German point of view, to have been correct. Allied fighters and light and medium bombers prowled the skies over Normandy from sunrise to sunset, and nothing that moved on the roads was likely to survive. Meanwhile, Hitler continued to insist that the prototype jet fighter being developed by Messerschmidt, which had already been flight tested, be sent back to the drawing board to be re-designed as a bomber. Galland was very bitter about this. The prototype had flown in late 1943--the actual fighter jet was not delivered until late 1944. The German "grunts" in Normandy would say, "If you see a white plane, that's the Tommies; if you see a black plane, that's the Amies (Americans); if you don't see any planes at all, that's the Luftwaffe."

I could go on and on like this, but i'll desist... for now.
 
 
Setanta
I have always heard it said the Hitlers greatest mistake and thank God he made it was not to finish off England before going to war with the Soviet Union. Any opinion?
 
 
 
Have to assume that he wanted it ALL.
 

Well, probably that's true.
 
 
 
Setanta
I have always heard it said the Hitlers greatest mistake and thank God he made it was not to finish off England before going to war with the Soviet Union. Any opinion?
 

I think his biggest mistake was going to war with the Soviet Union at all. "Finishing" England before or not. Although probably even without war with Soviet Union he would soon end up in problems. "Blitzkrieg" was short solution, I doubt Germany would be capable of controlling almost all Europe for a long time. War would certainly be longer, but eventually joint Europe would win - German army was extremely strong, but I doubt they were strong enough to keep control of Scandinavia, France, England and rest of Europe at the same time. Yes for short period (short in historic terms), but not for decades.
 
 
 
Setanta
I have always heard it said the Hitlers greatest mistake and thank God he made it was not to finish off England before going to war with the Soviet Union. Any opinion?
 

Yup
 
 
 
 
Setanta
I have always heard it said the Hitlers greatest mistake and thank God he made it was not to finish off England before going to war with the Soviet Union. Any opinion?
 

Yup
 

Set's shortest ever post. That must be one for the archives  
 
 
Wilso, in Mein Kampf (i actually read that tripe when i was 12--it says a lot about America that it was available in English in a small town library), Hitler wrote of his plan to find lebensraum, living space, for his master race in the Ukraine.

The proverbial handwriting on the wall...
 
 
 
--it says a lot about America that it was available in English in a small town library)
 

One discovery channel program I watched about that time, I heard a quote from a guy who lived through it.

"America didn't miss fascism by much-I know, I was there".

How much of the US' initial reluctance to join the war was a result of pressure from it's own German population? (Opinions sought)
 
 
After Pearl Harbor, the Imperial Idiot in Berlin declared war on the U.S., and that was good enough for most Americans. Before that time, however, isolationists were strong, so was the German-American Bund, and many high-profile Americans had chummed it up with Hitler, most notably, Charles Lindberg. Roosevelt definitely was not going to war in Europe without Hitler's idiotic declaration.
 
 
 
How much of the US' initial reluctance to join the war was a result of pressure from it's own German population? (Opinions sought)
 

I'm sure the effects were minimal. The  German-American Bund  existed, but it was an insignificant, fringe movement; I'd venture to say that most German-Americans either ignored or despised the Bundists.

Furthermore, the largest wave of German immigration occurred before 1870; most German-Americans were well-integrated into American society by the 1940s and were not seen as a potential threat (in contrast to Japanese-Americans or even Italian-Americans, who were often one generation removed from the old country). Obviously, the nation wouldn't have chosen a man named "Eisenhower" to lead its armies if it wasn't confident of German-Americans' loyalty.
 
 
As far as I know, the Russians used the same tactics against Hitler that they used against Napoleon. I'm sure Set can fill in the details. If Hitler had been smart, he may have realized that he was neither blonde, nor blue-eyed.
 
 
Nor tall, for that matter. I also understand he only had one testicle.
 
 
Joe, i would disagree with you only to point out that the German-American Bund kept itself before the public by playing the isolationist card for all it was worth...
 
 
Here is some more potent information:

 http://www.stevequayle.com/Giants/pics/giant.Nazi.html 
 
 
 
Joe, i would disagree with you only to point out that the German-American Bund kept itself before the public by playing the isolationist card for all it was worth...
 

Certainly, the Bundists knew how to get media attention. But that just made them a vocal lunatic fringe movement. Of far more importance were the isolationist groups like the America Firsters or the philo-fascists like Father Coughlin. In comparison to them, the Bund was a pathetic joke.
 
 
Coughlin was certainly both a crypto-facist and a crypto-racist.

I should clarify that i am much influenced by anectdotal information. In the small town in which i grew up with my grandpartents, Hitler was much admired by some, although certainly not all the residents. It is significant, however, that the admirers expressed their admiration publicly, without noticeable consequence. One of those was my middle- and high-school history teacher--she was always on about how Hitler was misunderstood, and the superiority of the German race.

John Birchers were common, but more closed-mouthed. Old timers who were willing to talk spoke of their regret that Hitler and the Nazis had "forced our hand," and spoke of their admiration for and agreement with Lindberg. I had the experience of confirming this anectdotal experience with the similar experience of other small town boys and girls such as myself.

Although i was born in New York and have a distinct affinity for the city, I've spent a great deal of my life in small towns, and have a stronger affinity for them. Many small town people with whom i've spoken, or of whom i have heard, have or had very racist attitudes towards the Japanese, and expressed regret for the necessity of "putting the Germans in their place."
 
 
 
Nor tall, for that matter. I also understand he only had one testicle.
 

"Among conspiracy buffs, this is what is known as (ahem) the lone-nut theory."

 The Straight Dope 
 
 
Well, for however much truth there may be in the fascinating discursus provided in Joe's link, i remain convinced that the old paperhanger was truly a weenie...
 
 
Question presupposes Hitler was dumb. He wasn't.
And he still lost.

If Bush was smart would he have won in Iraq?
 
 
 
 
 
Cheers, Bill, that's exactly the book of which i wrote... Teri Gross' interview of him was fascinating...
 
 
If Bush were smart, he would never had been President - there would be no Rove, Card, Dick, Rumps, Wolf or Amitage.........

No smart person would listen to these idiots.
 
 
 
Cheers, Bill, that's exactly the book of which i wrote... Teri Gross' interview of him was fascinating...
 

and, you forgot the main title but remembered the subtitle  
 
 
But that title was so hard to remember...
 
 
My father always told me that he saw St. Peterburg and Moscow.... luckily only from the distance.
 
 
Hitler was a Politcal Genius
Hitler was a Political Genius.

However, that did NOT translate into being a Military Genius (although some of this big strategic moves had huge military successes).

.........................................
Could Hitler have won? Yes.

Hitler gave England a wonderful gift: He let the BEF escape from Dunkirk. If, instead, he lets the panzers roll, the BEF ceases to exist.

No BEF, No North Afrika.

(1) No North Afrika (second front to appease Stalin)....then perhaps Hitler sues for Peace with Russia.

-or-

(2) Or he throws EVERYTHING into Russia and lets the Staff fight the war the way they want to (which includes the option of pulling back). The All At Russia option is a bit sketchier, though.

For Hitler, the turning point and loss of the war was Dunkirk. Knock-out the BEF and then sue for peace.

//BW
 
 
I don't think Hitler was a genius, political or otherwise. I think he was a complete sh1t. He led Germany to war, prolonged it unnecessarily and finally lost it through his own stupidity.
 
 
Hilter was a charismatic political genius. In the realm of Svengali.
What is interesting is that it was an age where charismatic dictators were in power - Hitler, Mussolini, Churchill, FDR, Tojo, Stalin, etc.
However, there is no reason Germany could not have won and kept Europe, if that had been their goal.
It was the insanity of Hilter; the personal cruelties of the Nazis; the meglomanical thirst for conquest of the Third Reich; that defeated Germany.
There is no way that any power can attack the entire world and win.
(Oh stop it, you anti-American dunderheads   We did not.)
But there would have been no reason for England not to have eventually caved in to a German conquest of Europe. It would not have been out of the ordinary, for the time.
But the Nasty Nazis, just like the Islamo Fascists (sorry, can't resist) ruin it for all "legitimate" border wars everywhere...
 
 
Bookmark
 
 
Sorry Moishe but I have to take issue with quite a bit in your last post

 
Hilter was a charismatic political genius. In the realm of Svengali.
 

Thats your opinion. There is no objective measurement

 
What is interesting is that it was an age where charismatic dictators were in power - Hitler, Mussolini, Churchill, FDR, Tojo, Stalin, etc.
 

Churchill and FDR dictators like Mussolini and Stalin? Come on man get a grip

 
However, there is no reason Germany could not have won and kept Europe, if that had been their goal.
 

Well I would suggest it was their goal. And there were quite a few reasons whey they did not succeed, including the intervention of the United States and the determination of countries like Britain and Russia.

 
It was the insanity of Hilter;
 

No one except lay pundits ever suggests that Hitler was clinically insane.

 
the personal cruelties of the Nazis; the meglomanical thirst for conquest of the Third Reich; that defeated Germany.
 

This all came out of Hitler's character and the philosophy of national socialism. It wasn't necessarily self destructing.

 
There is no way that any power can attack the entire world and win.
(Oh stop it, you anti-American dunderheads We did not.)
 

Germany did not attack the entire world.

 
But there would have been no reason for England not to have eventually caved in to a German conquest of Europe.
 

If Germany had defeated USSR in 1941/2 then things might have been different, but they didn't. There were some people in Britain calling for peace with Hitler, but the vast majority thoroughly detested nazism and all it represented. We stood our ground against Hitler, he could never have invaded this country without meeting resolute opposition and incurring considerable loss. (The RAF and the Navy were never defeated...something to think about when launching those invasion barges from Calais). Churchill's speeches about fighting on the beaches the towns the hills etc etc may have been rhetoric but it was inspiring rhetoric. Its easy now to say oh yes Britain would have "caved in". Well counterfactual arguments were never my favourite and the reality is that we did not cave in.

 
It would not have been out of the ordinary, for the time.
 

Perhaps Britain was not like France Holland Denmark Norway. I'm not an isolationist "little Englander", we are all part of the EU now, but there are events in our history that give cause for pride, and standing firm against national socialism is one of them.

 
But the Nasty Nazis, just like the Islamo Fascists (sorry, can't resist) ruin it for all "legitimate" border wars everywhere...
 

This last statement is incomprehensible to me.
 
 
 
Thats your opinion. There is no objective measurement
 

This is a forum  
 
 
Yes I know its a forum Rick

But it would be nice if people remembered occasionally to use the expression imo or "I think" before they restate opinion as if it were fact.
 
 
True.
 
 
Oy. I should know better.
Okay. It was admittedly throwaway opinions.
I will take five minutes to try and back them up.

 
Sorry Moishe but I have to take issue with quite a bit in your last post
Quote:
Hilter was a charismatic political genius. In the realm of Svengali.
Thats your opinion. There is no objective measurement
 

Yes, it's my opinion. However, looking at the films and reading his words and seeing the power of persuasion that he wrought, it seems a valid opinion.
I have no other particular theory for his rise to the position of Fuehrer.

 
Quote:
What is interesting is that it was an age where charismatic dictators were in power - Hitler, Mussolini, Churchill, FDR, Tojo, Stalin, etc.
Churchill and FDR dictators like Mussolini and Stalin? Come on man get a grip
 

No, only in terms of charismatic power. They were not (imo) cruel megolmanical monsters as were Stalin and Hilter. The power these various men wielded was dictatorial. And that's what makes it interesting to me. As England and the U.S. were democracies. I believe that there it was a "time of power."

Quote:

 
However, there is no reason Germany could not have won and kept Europe, if that had been their goal.
Well I would suggest it was their goal. And there were quite a few reasons whey they did not succeed, including the intervention of the United States and the determination of countries like Britain and Russia.
 

I was thinking of the initial conquest - France to Poland; Italy to Denmark.
The U.S. would not have been involved; Hilter already had a treaty with the Soviets; and if Germany would have then been peaceful towards England, it appears that England would have given up the fight...
I am positing that this would have been a "normal" European war scenario and had, in fact happened before (Napolean; Hapsburgs; Holy Roman Empire). It usually went smash when they continued to attack in a larger and larger sphere without already co-opting their conquered countries - as did Germany.
With History as evidence, Hilter, had he been sane, could have easily stopped and consolidated and ruled.

 
Quote:
It was the insanity of Hilter;
No one except lay pundits ever suggests that Hitler was clinically insane.
 

Fine. He was still a nutburger who killed and attacked simply because he felt like it. It felt good to him. Had he been a rational student of history, he would have stopped with the conquest of France.

 
Quote:
the personal cruelties of the Nazis; the meglomanical thirst for conquest of the Third Reich; that defeated Germany.
This all came out of Hitler's character and the philosophy of national socialism. It wasn't necessarily self destructing.
 

Actually, this is the crux. As far as I can discern, wanton destruction and cruelty has always been self defeating.

 
Quote:
There is no way that any power can attack the entire world and win.
(Oh stop it, you anti-American dunderheads We did not.)
Germany did not attack the entire world.
 

Okay, but North America; Asia; Europe; Australia and North Africa certainly qualify as a metaphorical "entire world."

 
Quote:
But there would have been no reason for England not to have eventually caved in to a German conquest of Europe.

If Germany had defeated USSR in 1941/2 then things might have been different, but they didn't. There were some people in Britain calling for peace with Hitler, but the vast majority thoroughly detested nazism and all it represented. We stood our ground against Hitler, he could never have invaded this country without meeting resolute opposition and incurring considerable loss. (The RAF and the Navy were never defeated...something to think about when launching those invasion barges from Calais). Churchill's speeches about fighting on the beaches the towns the hills etc etc may have been rhetoric but it was inspiring rhetoric. Its easy now to say oh yes Britain would have "caved in". Well counterfactual arguments were never my favourite and the reality is that we did not cave in.
 

Again, I was theorizing that a rational conqueror would have desisted with the conquest of France. I realize that that was not in my original post.

 
Quote:
It would not have been out of the ordinary, for the time.
Perhaps Britain was not like France Holland Denmark Norway. I'm not an isolationist "little Englander", we are all part of the EU now, but there are events in our history that give cause for pride, and standing firm against national socialism is one of them.
 

Absolutely. But with a theoretical "peaceful" Germany making overtures and no United States military backing up England, it would seem the wind would have been taken out of the sails.

 
Quote:
But the Nasty Nazis, just like the Islamo Fascists (sorry, can't resist) ruin it for all "legitimate" border wars everywhere...
This last statement is incomprehensible to me.
 

That's because I didn't explain that I believe Hilter's meglomanical desire for conquest and cruelty is what defeated Germany.
If he would have stopped by conquering most of Europe, history would have been very different.
If Saddam had not tried to invade Iran (horribly cruel) and Kuwait (viciously cruel), we would not be in Iraq today.
It is the mad desire for more power that creates the scenario for utter defeat regarding aggressive nations.
 
 
A few reasons that the Nazi's may have been defeated:

1. The ratio of German population to those it made mortal enemies, was far to small. German casualties (and those of its allies) steadily reduced it's ability to fight effectively, while the Allied forces continually grew and became stronger.

2. Germany did not have sufficient raw materials to support the sort of war effort needed to defeat the whole range of countries it was at war with. Oil, rubber, and a host of other critical resources severely constrained German war making.

3. German weapons design/strategy was faulty. Though some weapons systems were far ahead of their time, those systems were often plagued by "bugs" and were in such short supply that they could not be used with full effect. Some systems were not robust enough to withstand the rigors of combat in extreme conditions. Because there were many types, it was difficult sometimes to salvage parts from inoperable weapons to keep others going. The variety and complexity of design also made it difficult to keep sufficient expertise in maintenance and repair.

3a. Through most of the war period most German forces were issued bolt-action Mauser rifles not dis-similar to those used in WWI... and before. Though that is a fine rifle, it was greatly outclassed in firepower by the M1, other semi-automatic and fully automatic weapons used by the Allied powers. A German company just could not match the firepower of a platoon of MI, or burp-gun, wielding GIs or Ivans... both of whom more often attacked in larger formations.

4. Though German use of submarines gave it near supremacy in the Atlantic for a few years, its lack of a comprehensive navy was a disaster. To win Germany had to cut the supply line from the arsenals of America to Britain and the USSR. It failed to achieve that critical aim. Perhaps more and better submarines might have achieved the objective, but I don't think so... see items 1-3 above. German submarines were just no match for Allied ASW resources and techniques in the long run.

5. Air supremacy became critical in WWII. See items 1-3 above. As Allied control of the skies increased, the ability of German forces to effectively fight rapidly declined. German resources were stretched even further as war production was driven underground, or out to the extreme range of Allied bomber fleets. German logistics failed as Allied forces shifted strategic targets from war production plants to transportation networks. Though German war production remained relatively high, there was no way the munitions could be transported to line units short of ammunition, spare parts, etc. As the transportation network collapsed, it became increasingly difficult to move units to those parts of the battlefield where they would be most effective. This was particularly debilitating as the intensity of attack on the German homeland increased.

6. German logistics insufficient to support Armies on the Russian Front, in Africa, and on occupation duty within hostile populations. Troops and the supplies they required to effectively achieve mission requirements often didn't exist, and so many missions were at least relative failures. Germany began the war, and fought a pretty good part of it, using horse drawn carts to move men and supplies. That is suicidal in wars fought after 1920. Rail supply was in short supply, and the differences in rail systems often made it impossible to move material and men continuously from one point to another (i.e., differences in track gauge). To compound the rail problem, crucial rolling stock was diverted to move loot and death-camp bound prisoners.

7. The entrance of the United States into the war, doomed Germany. See 1-6 above. American population, production capacity, innovation, and will to win were decisive. Even if Hitler had not declared war after Pearl Harbor, the United States was committed to defeating the Nazi forces in Europe. Lend-Lease, and other support from the US helped keep Britain and the USSR "on the board" until America came fully into play. Once American resources came into Theater, the end was almost inevitable.

8. Failures in the C cubed system. Command structures were rigid, and often subordinate commanders were reluctant to use their own initiative to exploit unexpected opportunities. Subordinate commanders tended to show somewhat more initiative on defense when their lives were more obviously on the line. Command paralysis to some extent existed throughout the command structure. At the top, there were some brilliant commanders, but the number of political yes-men and incompetents remained high, too high when all elements of the equation are considered. Communications deteriorated as the war went on. Radios were in short supply in some units, and frequently operated on insecure frequencies. Breaking Axis codes gave the Allied forces a very great advantage in structuring force and counterforce. Most German communications were forced onto wire networks, and those were vulnerable to failure. See 5 above. Sabotage within occupied countries frequently disrupted communications. The result of command and communications failures was that coordination and control of German military forces was increasingly fragmented.

9. Though the effect of the resistance Movement in occupied countries has been occasionally over-emphasized, those movements did play an important part in bringing about the defeat of Germany. Communications and transportation attacks by members of the resistance, especially in periods leading up to Allied attacks was very useful in turning the tide against German forces. The need to maintain sizable troop concentrations within occupied areas deprived field commanders of desperately needed troops.

I could go on, but these nine factors I believe were sufficient to pretty much doom German hopes for Victory. Absent any two of the above faults in the equation, excepting item 7 the importance of having the United States as an enemy, Germany still probably could not have achieved total domination of the Europe for very long. The USSR could not be rolled over in the same fashion as Poland, nor was Britain the sort of target that Norway was.

When the decision was taken to go to war, Germany signed its own death warrant. Members of the General Staff warned their political masters of the problems, but were lulled by the ease with which early victories were achieved. Hitler, himself, probably was swept along the path to war by his own rhetoric and the need to maintain political control over his followers. The flaws in Hitler's and Germany's decision to go to war with the world might have occurred even if they had fully appreciated the risks they were taking.
 
 
The Way The HRE Gets Big (with Berlin as Capital)
Hitler rips a page out of Bismark's RealPolitik book and:

(1) quite easily destroys the BEF; and
(2) does not declare war on the U.S.A.; and
(3) respects the partition of Poland.

Bam! Hitler puts on the breaks, the U.K. is out of the picture and the U.S. and U.S.S.R. have no motiviation to fight. Germany puts its energy into positive Public Relations and the H.R.E. goes back to its old-school Habsberg borders.

All three of the above were within Hitler's ability to choose. So, to answer the question - yes, Germany wins.

//BW
 
 
I consider that Steve has made an error, but an understandable one. I consider that Moishe has been forming opinions based upon personal predilections, without much regard for factual substantiation, and has here displayed extremes of expression which are completely unjustified. The Germans did not operate in Asia at any time; that commonwealth troops from India, Australia and New Zealand is hardly a justifiable basis for a contention that Germany attacked Austrialia; German U-boats did attack shipping in North American waters, but never extensively, and never with significant success--and the purpose was to support their war effort in Europe through the strangulation of England, there is absolutely no reason to have characterized this as an attack on North America. I would point out to Steve that although Denmark took the line that discretion forms the better part of valor, and made not attempt to opposed the Nazis militarily, there was from first to last in the occupation of Denmark, a widespread and effective underground. King Hakkon could not mount a successful defense of Norway, but that did not stop him and the English and French from making the effort. Later in the war, Norwegians operated with British special services in significant numbers, and Norwegian sailors served with the Royal Navy, and many small vessels were brough to serve with the RN. The destroyer Stavenger operated with the RN, before being sunk by German E-boats in the Bay of the Seine during the Normandy invasion operations.

Which brings me to a few observations. The Germans had overrun western Europe militarily, and largely had control of central Europe. This hardly constitutes conquest in all its ramifications--sabotage in captured industry, and in German industry which relied upon forced labor was common; communist organizations in all the occupied territories immediately turned their political organizations into resistance movements. Moishe has created a fairly tale about former European conquests to suggest that the German attempt at conquest in the mid-20th century has antecedants--it does not. Louis XIV and Napoleon certainly made such an effort; there was never any such thing as a Holy Roman Empirse sufficiently cohesive and monolithic to have characterized it as even controlling those German states comprising what was essentially a voluntary political and legal conference, let alone attempt the conquest of Europe; the House of Hapsburg never attempted such a conquest, and was usually (although not always) to be found opposed to French attempts at hegemony, and later, unsuccessfully opposing the Prussian drive for German hegemony. This is a feeble attempt at historical comparison and synthesis which is unworthy of an undergraduate history student. Louis XIV in fact achieved many of his goals, and added to the territory of France--his attempts to establish a French hegemony failed. Napoleon managed to conquer much of Europe--but Spain was his "Viet Nam," and the guerilla there bled France's resources white, long before the disasterous invasion of Russia. There was no equivalent resistance to Napoleon to compare to the nearly universal underground resistance to Nazism. In many respects, after the failure of will of national governments in opposing Germany, the "little" men and women of Europe had their finest hour in resisting the Nazis.

Moussolini's rhetoric hardly qualifies anyone to characterize hims as "svengali-like." His opera buffa performances, so much ridiculed in England and the United States, was simply a case of playing to the crowd, which, in Italy, appreciated and applauded the style. Again and again, Moussolini squandered what little political capital the Fascisti had with the Italian people through bungled or failed military efforts, such as in Ethiopia, Egypt and Lybia, and in the Balkans.

I don't accept the nonsense that Hitler had any "svengali-like" effect on the German nation, either. Basically, a supremely successful gutter politician, he coopted the most effective programs of other street gangs, in particular the Brown Shirts; and he told people what they wished to hear. Virtually none of the Nazi political rhetoric before 1933 was original to Hitler or any of his toadies. His over-inflated estimation of his military judgment was disasterous for Germany, but his canny assessment of the growing political chaos in Poland after the death of Pilsudski, and of the lack of will on the part of the pre-war governments of France and England, created an illusion which many Germans, even military men, shared of his military judgment.

His first great error in judgment was the assumption that England would roll over as had the essentially "facist-wannabe" government of France. There were no operational plans for an invasion of England, which i personally believe was "do-able" in the Summer of 1940, but not thereafter. In his war memoir, Adolf Galland demonstrates the ease with which he siezed and maintained air superiority over the English Channel in broad daylight and clear weather, when Scharnhorst, Gniesenau and Prinz Eugen ran the Channel. This occured at a time when England's air and naval resources were much better than they had been in 1940. The superior performance of German airborne troops in capturing the crucial forts which guarded the Maas River locks at the opening of the war in the west, and the incredible performance of Kurt Student's First FJ Army (i won't pretend i can correctly spell falschirmjaeger ) in Crete, in which they took and held their objectives despite casualties in excess of 70% and against repeated counterattacks by the British and New Zealanders--both suggest that the Germans could have opened an airborne bridgehead in Kent, and reinforced it with landings, were such landings made as quickly as possible, and the troops involved knew they had three days supplies, and must secure their provender thereafter. In the summer of 1940, Churchill had almost nothing with which to opppose such an invasion.

But Hitler had badly misjudged the opposition when it came to Norway, Poland and England. The two former nations fought on even when eventual defeat, sooner rather than later, was apparent. The English in the main never seem to have considered the possiblity of defeat--and in this case, that was the "good" variety of hubris.

I won't grace comparisons of FDR and WSC to either Hitler or Svengali with comment. The contention that Hitler simply wished to glut himself with endless conquest is as silly as the contention that he was clinically insane. He may have been--no one has demonstrated as much. His invasion with Russia was part and parcel with his dicta in Mein Kampf about the necessity to find living space in the Ukraine. Stalin misjudged Hitler by giving him too much credit for good military judgment, and thought that no invasion would occur before late 1942, or 1943. (For confirmation of this from papers released by the Russian, see Stalin, the Court of the Red Tsar, by Montefiori, recently published.) There was nothing in the least charismatic about Stalin--he didn't depend upon charm to maintain his grip on power. The characterization of Tojo as a charismatic dictator is so far from anything like the truth as to suggest that Moishe hasn't the slightest idea of how Hideki Tojo became Army Minister and then Prime Minister, nor of the terms of parliamentary government in Japan after 1923 and before their eventual defeat. I'd need about as much space as i've already used to explain that one.

As with your Islamophobia and racist remarks about Arabs and other Muslims, Moishe, this series of remarks demonstrates that you have strong opinions, without apparently feeling the necessity to have informed yourself carefully before forming them.
 
 
Set, I'm not exactly sure where you are pointing out my error. It's possible I made one,   (it has been known) but I'm not sure what it was.

It is my contention that if Hitler had defeated the USSR in 1941, then Britain would have gone down, probably, but gone down fighting.

I'm not saying that makes us superior to the French or the Dutch or the Danish. But there were three things to our advantange which other nearer neighbours of Hitler did not possess.

1. The English Channel

2. The RAF and Royal Navy, as I said not defeated, bloodied but not destroyed. Its not exactly easy mounting an invasion across the channel even if you have total air and naval superiority, as the Allies found out in June 1944. How much more difficult for a few hundred invasion barges being strafed by the air force and blown to bits by naval and on shore guns?

3. The British will to defend our island, personified by Churchill. There were most certainly questions of morale/politics in France in particular which hindered their ability to mount effective defense. There were no such considerations in Great Britain.

Its possible that after the defeat of USSR, the internal pressure on the govt to make some acceptable peace deal might have been overwhelming.

But by 1942, Britain was militarily stronger than 1940, we had seen off the Luftwaffe during the Battle of Britain, and I think we would have been "up for it" i.e. for anything Hitler could throw at us in 1942/3. (Note I am not saying we would WIN just not CAVE IN).

I'm not saying everything British is best. Or that the Empire taught the world how to be civilised. There are plenty of things in our history that we should hang our head over...in particular as I know you have an interest in this, Ireland.

But the story of how this country, alone, stood up to national socialist Germany is something in my view that we can be proud of.

(And thanks btw for coming over and giving us a hand in changing the German regime 1943-5)
 
 
No problem, Boss, we were glad to help out--but don't ask for that sort of thing right now, the boys in DC are a little to eager for that sort of party these days.

In pointing out that the RN and RAF were undefeated, you ignore an aspect of military operational planning which has saved many a uniformed ass time and again--local superiority of force. The most notable beneficiary of this principle was Frederick II during the Seven Years War. His most notable victories, and his bloodiest failed attacks, came when he attempted this.

I have mentioned Adolf Galland's war memoir many times in these fora-- The First and the Last. It is a short and very informative read, i highly recommend it. He describes the operation in which he covered the two battleships and one cruiser i've named when they "ran" the English Channel in broad daylight on a clear day. All that is necessary for such an operation is a temporary, local superiority of force--which Galland managed and maintained through what must have felt like a very long day.

When the RN went after Bismark, they eventually blasted it to smithereens by a concentration of force. Earlier, however, in a more or less one on one situation (Lutjens little task force of Bismark and Prinz Eugen was technically outnumbered, but Norfolk and Suffolk would have committed suicide to engage the latter, let alone the former), Bismark required fewer than ten minutes to send Hood to the bottom, with all but three members of her 1400 man complement. Bismark eventually received a pounding such as been delivered to no other battleship in history. Nevertheless, survivors estimate that there were from 600 to 800 men in the water after the action, and that had the RN not left them there, all could have been saved.

The point of all of this is that Admiral Raeder had in the Kriegsmarine a force which, ship for ship, was the match of any navy in the world. In the nasty and bitterly fought contest for Narvik in Norway, the KM destroyers sacrificed themselves in what most navies would have considered unacceptable numbers-- but they drove off the RN and saved the landing force.

My mention of German airborne operations in Holland in the beginning of the war, and Student's operation against Crete are the final piece of a puzzle of whether or not the Germans could have effected a landing on the coast of Kent. The titular question here is whether or not the Germans could have won had Hitler been smart. I would suggest the question is moot, because militarily, he wasn't. However, it might have been possible for Germany to have established a negotiating position, and put themselves in a defensive position which might, and only just might, have allowed them to withstand an attack by the Soviet Union. I have little doubt that Stalin would sooner or later have come to that.

In Churchill's book The Second World War, he contends that after Dunkirk, there were a few (two or three if i recall correctly) of the loose militia-type units which were eventually designated Territorial Divisions. They were indifferently to poorly trained, badly equipped, and had no organic logistical support. More than 300,000 Tommies, French and Belgian troops had been evactuated to England, but they were without arms and ammunition. But the Werhmacht (sp?) reached the English Channel and the Bay of Biscay and came to an abrupt halt. Hitler had no further plans, and i suspect was privately surprised that England did not cave in as had France. Poland and Norway ought to have taught him the lesson that some people would literally rather die rather than submit--by then i would suggest that he was in the grip of full-blown megalomania, brought on by a success i doubt he ever even dreamed of in 1922.

Sound military doctrine ought to have included contingency plans for an invasion of Merry Old, and one which the Germans were prepared immediately to implement. Kurt Student could have secured a bridgehead in Kent with the equivalent of two divisions of paratroopers, and heavy infantry weapons and artillery could have been brought in by glider. The 101st Airborne and the 82nd Airborne did exactly that at night in Normandy in the nightmare of the Norman hedgerows. Airborne troops were then the elite infantry in each nation, England's Red Devils proved that at Arnhem in Monty's disastrous Market Garden operation in 1944.

Achieving local superiority of naval forces would not have been necessary to allow the landing of one or two more divisions on the beaches of Kent. An excellent novel about German U-boat service in that war, which was titled Sharks and Little Fishes in English, makes a point which i have since verified in other sources. The early submarine service in the Kriegsmarine was designed to operate in the Baltic, and not the mid-Atlantic. They would have been in a familiar type of waters in the Channel. The Luftwaffe was more than capable of acheiving and maintaining local air superiority. Again, Churchill recounts that in September 1940, Air Marshall Sir Arthur Tedder told him that the RAF could only hold out a few more days under the pressure of the Battle of Britain. Fortunately for Blighty, the Luftwaffe switched to night time area bombing (although certainly not, of course, fortunate for the East Enders, or the people of Coventry and Sheffield). In June 1940, Goering could have put up a cloud of fighters over the Channel. The Supermarine Spitfire was at the limit of its operational range over the Channel, and the RAf would have had little time to have cleared the skies, and i seriously doubt they could have done. Capital ships do not move at very great speed. When Churchill was First Lord before the First World War, he demanded that Admiral Fisher build him battleships which could make 21 knots. The Kriegsmarine could well have sortied from the Kiel Canal, and, operating near Heligoland to give them air cover, could well have put the RN in the position of having no resources to oppose a quick trip of invasion barges across the Channel.

All of this, however, presupposes two things which are hilarious when one keeps in mind what a grip Hitler had on military operations. First, it presupposes that Adolf knew his enemy well enought to have known he'd be obliged to fight his way ashore in England before the English would yield. On that heading, he was clueless. Otherwise, there would have been such operational planning, ready for implementation. Secondly, it presupposes that the Austrian corporal would know how to use naval assets, and to make a reasonable risk assessment on luring the RN to battle in the North Sea. From the standpoint of what was to be gained, i have no doubt that Raeder would have been prepared to risk all of his major assets to achieve such an end--the performance of the destroyers at Narvik, and of Scharnhorst in her final days operating against Allied convoys to Murmansk (another great war memoir is that of a common seaman on Scharnhorst, who had the dubious good fortune to have been assigned to look-out duty on the night the RN sank her, in December, in the waters off northern Norway--that boy was lucky he didn't freeze in the water before an RN destoyer picked him up)--these suggest to me that even in the face of likely destruction, the German sailor would have put up one hell of a fight.

That is why i say that an invasion was "do-able." But, the "what-ifs" are all trumped by the simple fact that militarily, Hitler was a rank amateur, who staggered from one disasterous decision to the next. The litany of his major blunders alone would fill many pages here. In the assessment above, i left out his total incomprehension of the nature of airborne forces and their effective use--simply because Crete had not happened yet, and he hadn't yet decided not to risk Goering's favorite boys ever again. What the FJ's accomplished on Crete was significant, however, and the high casualty rate was more than justified, from a military point of view, because of the result. I doubt that the FJ's would have suffered that level of casualties landing in Kent, and it would have been worth it to have established a bridgehead into which simply a few German divisions could have been brought ashore, to the ultimate undoing of Churchill and company.

Therefore, to return to my constant theme in this and other threads--the question is moot, Hitler was an idiot militarily speaking. Even had the scenario i've outlined here played out, the likely result would have been most of Europe in Soviet hands by 1950. German chances of effective defense of central and western Europe against Stalin would have been slim indeed.
 
 
Oy vey izmir.
Okey dokey.
My whole fantasy scenario is based on IF.
If Germany had not attacked the Soviet Union.
If German conquest had ended with France.
If Germany consolidated its rule in Europe and did not massacre the Slavs; the Jews; the Poles; the Gypsies; etcetera.
If Germany behaved like other conquerors such as Napolean, who tried to co-opt other nationalities; or the German Holy Roman Empire, who tried to co-opt other nations; or even William of Normandy, whose offspring assimilated into England - but didn't make their mistakes (Russia; Imperial indifference; etc.)
Then there is no reason that they could not have kept Europe. Why not? Europe is trying to give over to German hegemony today? No?

(And Germany was at war with the world. They didn't have to be. But, if they are allied, which they were, with Japan, then their war extends, which it in fact did, to the U.S., Australia, China, etcetera. And, the Soviet Union covers most of Asia. No?)

It's all an IF.
It would have taken a sane and rational thinker and military mind to know when to stop and rule instead of conquer.
Hilter did not have such a mind.
 
 
Germany attacked the Soviet Union because this was part of Hitler's core plan as outlined in Mein Kampf. Even had they not, i am convinced that Stalin would have attacked them.

At the time that the German advance halted in France, they were already in Holland, Belgium, Norway, Denmark and Poland. The incompetence and stunning geopolitical stupidity of Moussolini assured that they would end up in Yugoslavia and then Greece. Hungary was (the government at least), a willing ally. Finland became an ally because they were willing to make a deal with Satan if necessary to get the wherewithal to continue to resist the Soviet invasion. It is hopelessly short-sighted to have seen this as only about overrunning France. The war was presaged by the partition of Czechoslovakia, assuring that they would come into conflict with Poland, which seized a part of Silesia. The war proper in Europe begins in Poland, which assures a long and very difficult to defend border with the Russians. Even absent Hitler's obsession with the Ukraine, this was a recipe for eventual conflict with the Soviet Union.

Germany never succeeded in "consolidating" its rule in Europe because of local resistance. Only in Spain in the beginning of the 19th century did Napoleon face any resistance equivalent to that which the Germans faced right across Europe. It has been reasonably estimated that the escape attempts of Allied POW's alone required at least two divisions staioned in Germany and the surrounding border regions to deal with the problem. Italy proved completely incapable of effectively garrisoning Yugoslavia, and Hitler had to step in after the Greeks bloodied the Italian nose--and the supreme irony here is that Mataxas was a facist and a great admirer of Hitler.

Napoleon, as was the case with Hitler, and even Louis XIV for that matter, was totally clueless about sea power. The French in the 18th century were building better ships than the English, and RN commanders liked nothing better than to be given a captured French frigate. Napoleon made no effective use of his naval assets. This left him in the position of being obliged to attempt to choke England economically--hence his Continental System, which was a monumental failure. The open defiance of the Continental System by the Russian Empire left him with no choice but to invade, or see the rapid dissolution of his control of central Europe. Napoleon co-opted no one. He put his brothers on thrones in Spain, Holland and Westphalia, which had to be propped up by French bayonets--except in Westphalia, where Jerome Bonapart became a serious and popular ruler dedicated to the welfare of "his people," to the extent of opposing Napoleon's demand for troops, which lead to his being "unthroned" by his brother. Spain continued to be an open, profusely bleeding wound which drained France horribly. Napoleon had little regard for anyone other than himself and his family, and that included the French, whom he often openly despised. Given that he was considered by the English, Prussians and Austrians of his day to be as great a monster as Hilter would be considered in the 20th century, he is a poor choice for an analogy. Even poorer in that his European conquests were never secure, even without English opposition. During the 1809 Wagram campaign, he was obliged to fight all over again the populous and powerful House of Hapsburg, and the best of his armies, his NCO's and officers were left dead on the fields outside Vienna. As it was, the Archduke only surrendered on orders of the Emperor, and was prepared to continue the fight. Had the Emperor Alexander not opposed his will, under pressure from the Russian aristocracy, who were losing heavily due to the Continental System, you can bet that Austria would have been back for another round, and Prussia as well. At one point, and one point only, in late winter of 1814, the Allies would have allowed him to remain on his self-made throne, with the Pyrannes and the Rhine recognized as France's "natural" borders--and he rejected it, demanding all or nothing. Of course, in the end, he got nothing.

You seem to have no realistic idea of what the Holy Roman Empire of the German Nation was. It was never a unified political entity. It had no armies, other than what German "princelings" were grudgingly willing to commit on those few occasions when they could be prodded to unified action. The HRE co-opted no nations.

As for William the Conqueror, the army of largely Normans, with a hefty minority of "pan-european" mercenaries and adventurers, were eventually assimilated into the English nation, but not without profound changes to the polity and the culture. The situations are no where analogous at all. In an age in which there was no such thing as a nation in Europe, and no such thing as a national navy, William's bold grab at conquest succeeded largely because almost no one else cared, and none were willing to dispute his conquest, or to try to take it away from him. The death of Harold at Hastings left the Anglo-saxons leaderless, and when the eventually did rise, with no coordination, William quashed the rebellion with the bloody purge known as "the Harrying of the North," which went far beyond the estates of rebel AS nobility. As for his offspring, William Rufus was murdered, and Rufus' son Henry died without heir, when his son disappeared at sea off the coast of Normandy, under murky and suspicious circumstances. William's offspring were historical non-sequiturs.

I consider it ludicrous to contend that the people of Europe woudl have acquiesced in the conquest of the western and central portions of the continent by Germany, without even considering how tempting a target it made for Stalin, had he been left unmolested.

The putative alliance with Japan was meaningless from a Japanese point of view. The Japanese gave not one iota of support to Germany, and made not the slightest alteration of their foreign policy to accomodate this alleged alliance. Hitler's greater stupidity is evinced by his idiotic declaration of war against the United States in 1941. Bogged down in the invasion of Russia, he did nothing for Japan by that declaration, but he certainly played into Roosevelt's hand, as FDR had always wished to make Germany the target of American might. So little did the alliance mean to Japan, that they concluded an armistice with the Soviet Union, which allowed Stalin to transfer crucial military assets to the west to defend Moscow. Absent that declaration of war, Germany was at war with Canada, by dint of the war with Britain. FDR could not have justified a major commitment to Europe without that declaration, as American attention would rightly have been focused on the Pacific.

Australia was at war with Germany for the same reason Canada was, membership in the British Commonwealth. That Hitler was stupid to have taken on the Brits without finishing the job in 1940 is not to be doubted. That he willfully chose to add South Africa, India, Canada, Australia and New Zealand to the list of forces arrayed against him is an allegation without foundation.

No, the Soviet Union does not cover most of Asia.

That Hilter did not have a military mind i would not, of course, dispute. That he could have chosen a point to put a term to his conquest and have been left unmolested in possession of western and central Europe is ridiculous, and ignores the realities of the situation into which Hitler plunged Germany.
 
 
bookmarking
 
 
Set

Thanks a lot for clarifying - at would have taken me ages to write that!

May I add that the Kingdom of Westphalia with Kassel as capital made up largely of Prussian and Hanoverian possessions between the Weser and the Elbe rivers and the greater part of electoral Hesse? Which means that less than 1/10 of this territiry was actually "Westphalia".

(I own a licence to carry firearms, from the Direction Gnrale de la Haute-Police du Royaume, Commissaire Gnrale, Prfucture de Fulde, so don't contradict!)
 
 
There really ought to be the little bowing icons to acknowledge total and abject defeat.
Mea culpa, mea culpa, mea maxima culpa.
I will refrain from speculating on fanatasy scenarios.
I will only fantasize on speculative scenarios where one might be able to postulate from one thing to the next.
(Yet, the Earth still moves!....) (Not that he really said that...   )
 
 
I believe Hitler wanted a political settlement with Britain, and that Rudolf Hess's flight to Scotland had something to do with that.

But it didn't happen, and although the Battle of Britain was a pretty close run thing, it was still a defeat for the Luftwaffe. [Goering asked Galland at one time what he needed, answer "Spitfire squadrons"]. I think there was a large element of bluff in Hitler's invasion plans in 1940/41. When area bombing failed to produce the collapse in morale and change of govt. that he hoped for Hitler decided to attack the USSR as it was always part of his greater plan, but also as a means of ultimately defeating Britain. (According to Prof Ian Kershaw - "Hitler").

Even if he had knocked the USSR out of the war by the end of 1941, I can't see how he could be in a position to lauch an meaningful invasion attempt before spring 1943, by which time Britain would have been in a much stronger position than 1940 (when we were indeed fast running out of pilots).

I think there would have been a stand off, between the great land power and a potentially useful maritime power. Given several years of rapprochment who knows? 1955 Hitler travels to London to mark the official opening of the Channel tunnel, meet the Queen and address parliament? No I don't think so either.  
 
 
The things you point out are germaine to the later course of the war. What i was addressing was a contention that Adolf could have put a term to his conquest and consolidated and held it. This was never going to happen with England in opposition. The only time such an invasion could have had any prospect of success would have been a few weeks in the summer of 1940. To have done so would have meant advance preparation, before the batttle of France. And that would have meant that Hitler understood what he was getting into, and have prepared for a contingency in which the Enlgish did cave in to pressure.

See posts more numerous than i can recount, some in more, some in less detail, as to why i consider Hitler to have been an idiot.
 
 
Well (Steve knows this already), my father belonged to those, who saw the "white cliffs of Dover" twice in a German uniform. (There are even some photos - they really were rather close, regarding the primitive camera he used in those days.)

He told me, the first time, they started this "invasion", everyone thought, it just was an exercise (motto: 'let's see, if we could do such').
When he did it the second time, they didn't take it serious at all, and he even didn't take his complete military outfit on this 'voyage' [motto:'We know that this is impossible.']
 
 
Seems to me there is broad agreement here. The thing that rattled my cage was that "Hitler was a genius" and that Britain would "cave in".

But one thing really intrigues me, and that's Rudolf Hess. What was he up to? Later it seems it suited both sides to discount him as having gone mad...and it may be so.

But why keep him in isolation all those years? And even at the end when he commits suicide, there is doubt about whether it was really Hitler's deputy in Spandau gaol.

So Walter, you are in possession of illegally taken photographs of the Dover fortifications....

If your father's camera was really good, you might be able to spot my father, possibly waving or perhaps not. He was in Dover for a while about that time. [And its a good job they didn't shoot each other, or contributions to this a2k thread would curtailed....]
 
 
Well, as far as I remember the vies on those photos (saw them a couple of years ago the last time), you can only see same German soldiers soldiers in a landing craft.... and what might be the cliffs in the very far distance.

I agree with your last sentence, not only re A2K, but especially, since I otherwise hadn't met Barney and... :wink:
(But actually, my father always had a non-combattant status during the war.)
 
 
It is one of my great regrets never to have had more in depth discussions with my father. I don't know whether he had non combattant status or not...he was in the RAF but seemed to spend most of his time on a small boat. I think he was involved with logistics or something. Anyway he found himself in Belfast, Dover, Freetown (Now Lagos I think) and various other nice and distinctly un nice places

He said he was once given a rifle and told to go and guard RAF Aldegrove against the IRA. He had to explain that he had never actually handled a rifle before, which infuriated his commanding officer so much that he was sent on a training course to learn the difference between the bang and non-bang ends. So after that he probably did have combat status!

Barney sends his best wishes btw, at least I think thats what he was saying as I "encouraged" him out of the house. Not too much blood this time. :wink:
 
 
Lagos is in Nigeria, Freetown in Sierra Leone--and i believe it is still known by that English name. With all the hoo-rah in Lybia and Egypt, Freetown assumed a great deal of significance--supplies and soldiers from India and South Africa came by way of the Atlantic, because the Med was not secure, and Freetown was an important base along that route. Churchill mentions its significance in his book.
 
 
Quite right Set, thanks it was in Freetown where my father caught dysentry and his weight dropped to 6 stones.

Was hoping you could enlighten me on Hess...save me the bother of doing the research  
 
 
I really don't know what motivated Rudolph Hess. I rather suspect they kept him under wraps because he arrived with damaging information on Englishmen who were in high social positions. The Duke of Windsor comes to mind. I don't know, though, and would rather not do much speculation.

Dysentary is an awful thing--i contracted bacillary dysentary while overseas, and lost 65 pounds in ten days. It can kill, and is quite debilitating even when one has access to good medical care. Small wonder it kills infants so quickly and easily.
 
 
You say...ary and I say...ery

I dont think anyone has ever written a song about dysentery before, always the first time though.

Regarding Hess, I'm sure the full story is still to be told. I suspect he was hoping to make contact with that faction of the british establishment (including the abdicated King Edward VIII) who were sympathetic to nazism, to make some peace offer. And this could cause severe embarrassment to the royal family even today.

Find it difficult to believe this was a freelance effort by a mad man though
 
 
There is the problem, though, of Hess suddenly taking off in a small plane, alone, and landing in Scotland. I suspect that the entire idea was his brain-child, and that it had been vetoed, leading him to act on his own recognizance. As you point out, it could still be embarrassing to that German family in Windsor Palace, so i doubt that you or i will live to see the truth revealed.
 
 
Balance of Power [minus] Power = Nothing to Balance
THE CHEESE STANDS ALONE
England could not win the war - they could only hope to hang on until the Russians and Yanks showed up.

If the Russians and Yanks do not show up, then the English sit on their island. The Krauts never had plans to invade England (it was a bluff). England can not change anything on their own (they are historically the Balance of Power but with their forces destroyed at Dunkirk - there is nothing for them to do.)

NO REDS
If Hitler lets the partition of Poland stand (and forgoes the Ukranian adventure), then Russia has no reason to attack Germany. If the Reds decide to attack, then good luck to them. Assuming Hitler forgoes the invasion of Russia, then the Russians get to tangle with a totally different German army. The Reds against a Static, depleted and worn-out German army is one thing. The Reds against a highly mobile, fresh and mechanized German army is another thing. A contemporary anecdote is the Winter War.

NO YANKS
The Germans never intended to cross the channel - so Hitler chooses never to engage in the "Battle" of Britain. Hitler does not declare war on the U.S.A Hitler sends out the "can't we all just get along" message to the world and offers peace to the Brits. The Yanks have no motivation to go to war and don't.

NO DICE
Hitler keeps half of Poland, half of France and the rest of the H.R.E.

//BW

Unrelated Footnote: As for Fritz, he was the modern father of local superiority. The western world had basically forgotten to use it for about 2,000 years.
 
 
Alright i am a new member here so this is a reply to all the hitler stuff. First what hitler should of done was finish off the western allies (ie. britain and resistances) Then after he had a proper puppet government in britain as he did in france, he should have tighted his grip on his allies (Finnland, Hungary, Rumania and all others he had) then by this time i believe that spain would have seen the weakness of the allied armies and therefore allie franco would have allied with germany.

Oh and by the way in the time while this is all happeneing hitler is conducting a massive breeding program of the german race which will be the occupiers of hitlers new european territories.

Also on another note i agree his declaration of war on the U.S. was stupid but it was only pe-mature. he should have waited t'ill they were deep in japaneese territory to declare war.

Anyway hitler now attackes the U.S.S.R. with his axis and allies which would literally rip apart russia and would surrender very soon after. Also I would have italy and spain occupy the russians more eastern terrirory.

Now at this time he would have swept into africa talken it and the arabian states and then probably even china (Japan would have left to fight the americans)

Then at this time the americans would have discovered the nuke along with the Nazi's and we would have still gone into a cold war.

Inconclusion the nazi's by the 1955 could have had all of europe africa and lots of asia and with engough forces to take out the states (probaby end up in nuklear holocaust killing everyone though)
Hitler would have illegalized marrage between none nordic people and boosted his own efforts of making the master race.
But in the end the US would have givin because they would have been in a very lage sieg. with the germans having superrior resourses he would have raped the U.S.

Oh one last thing a Naz would have been the first man on the moon (since the americans stole all the nazi rocket scientists who got them up there in the first place!

thank you all fro allowing me to get that all out.
 
 
I just wanted to say sorry about my first post it has tons of...............grammatical errors, so....sorry to all readers.

Also i would like to add that it was only a shortened version of what i think Hitler should have done and i didn't write an entire book on it like this sentana does each post......Christ!!!

Also i would very much appreciate feedback on my post thanks.

-Hans
 
 
Hans
I get the distinct impression that you are sorry Germany lost the war. Am I mistaken? I hope so.
 
 
Since you object to my "books," here's a flyer... all of these "gee, those cool Nazis could have won" scenarios which get advanced ignore the simple reality that Hitler was militarily stupid, and that all of Germany, military and civilian, were fully in the grip of the NSDAP apparatus, making the probability of the "intelligent strategies" advanced nil. It didn't happen because the very nature of Adolf and the NSDAP mitigated against an intelligent approach.
 
 
You asked for feedback, so here you go:

 
Alright i am a new member here so this is a reply to all the hitler stuff. First what hitler should of done was finish off the western allies (ie. britain and resistances) Then after he had a proper puppet government in britain as he did in france, he should have tighted his grip on his allies (Finnland, Hungary, Rumania and all others he had) then by this time i believe that spain would have seen the weakness of the allied armies and therefore allie franco would have allied with germany.
 

"Finishing off" the western allies is not a thesis ammenable to be tossed out and moving on. In any scenario in which Hitler's forces do not leave continental Europe (i.e., supporting the Italians in North Africa), Britain has at its disposal six brigades from Australia, a New Zealand "super division" (it was a mechanized division nearly twice the size of a standard British infantry division of the day), a South African armored division, at least three Canadian divisions, and six to eight Indian infantry divisions as well as several mechanized and armored regiments--all of which forces existed before the war, completely equipped. A scenario of "finishing off" the western allies must necessarily ignore the resolve of Churchill in particular, and the English people in general. It ignores the huge resources available to England, while Germany was slowly starving for resources, petroleum in particular. It ignores that the conquered nations provided more than just local "insurgencies." Polish troops eventually numbered three infantry divisions and an armored brigade; Polish pilots made up 40% of the flyers in the Battle of Britain, and Americans, Canadians, Belgians, French, Norwegians and Danes all flew for the RAF; the Belgians provided an infantry brigade; despite bad relations, the French eventually provided more troops in the west, many from the African colonies, than any ally other than Britain and the United States. Tossing off the phrase "finishing off the western allies" demonstrates a lack of perspective on what would have been involved in such an effort.

Finland was an ally on in so far as they wanted help to throw the Soviets out of their country. Having reached their 1938 borders, they refused to advance any further, and nothing the Germans could do would alter that. They'd have made a pact with Satan himself to get the Soviets out, but they were dedicated to their own sense of justice in the matter, and invasion of the Soviet Union was simply not on the table. Hungary and Rumania were allies largely by coercision. Admiral Hrothy refused to deport Hungarian Jews to Germany, and neither of these nations made substantial contributions to the invasion of Russia. Mere numbers mean nothing--when the river froze over at Stalingrad after November 14, 1942, the Soviet Guards divisions poured across, and shattered a Roumanian army in a matter of hours, surrounding and cutting off the German 6th Army in Stalingrad in a matter of days. The Hungarian, Roumanian and Italian troops in Russia were never reliable front-line troops, and their only useful contribution was to occupy portions of the line in what were considered "quiet" sectors. In particular, the Germans coerced Roumania because of their petroleum resources. The Wehrmacht depended heavily upon horses, and throughout the war, the Germans were operating from hand to mouth in the matter of petroleum.

Franco headed the Falange. Although it is always, and not unfairly, identified as facist, there was no natural affinity between the Spanish and the Germans. In fact, a Falange volunteer division did serve in the Soviet Union with the Germans. The notion that Franco would have thrown significant military force onto the German side, especially after the devastating civil war of the late 1930's, is unrealistic.

 
Oh and by the way in the time while this is all happeneing hitler is conducting a massive breeding program of the german race which will be the occupiers of hitlers new european territories.
 

You really do like that old boy Hitler, don't ya. The "massive breeding" program to which you refer, even if more than a pipe-dream of racist Germans, would have done little good in that contemporary situation. Hitler became Chancellor in 1933. Children born then and thereafter would not reach adulthood until 1951 or later--fully a decade after Hitler invaded the Soviet Union. This is such nonsense, i hardly know if it is to be taken seriously.

 
Also on another note i agree his declaration of war on the U.S. was stupid but it was only pe-mature. he should have waited t'ill they were deep in japaneese territory to declare war.
 

Japan did nothing to aid German in that war. In fact, they concluded an armistice with the Soviet Union which freed a significantly substantial number of troops to be shipped to the west. There was absolutely no value for Germany in a declaration of war against the United States, neither in 1941 or later. Such a declaration was stupid, in 1941, and at any time thereafter. I can't imagin what you mean by "deep in japanese territory," but in fact, the United States did not at any time occupy Japanese territory until the Japanese had capitulated, unless one counts the mandates--and a flimsier basis for considering this "deep in japanese territory" i could not imagine. American resources deployed to the Pacific were primarily naval and air power resources; in Europe, the necessary resources were land forces and air forces. As far as air forces go, we demonstrated that we had sufficient means for both theaters. As far as land forces go, air superiority allowed Eisenhower to operate for long periods of time with fewer troops on the ground than the Germans disposed of. A German declaration of war on the United States was stupid at any time, for any reason.

Anyway hitler now attackes the U.S.S.R. with his axis and allies which would literally rip apart russia and would surrender very soon after. Also I would have italy and spain occupy the russians more eastern terrirory.

Now at this time he would have swept into africa talken it and the arabian states and then probably even china (Japan would have left to fight the americans)

 
Then at this time the americans would have discovered the nuke along with the Nazi's and we would have still gone into a cold war.
 

The Allies were worried that the Germans would have developed a nuke, but that program wasn't even close. Your Nazi-Allies cold war suggestion is a chimera.

 
Inconclusion the nazi's by the 1955 could have had all of europe africa and lots of asia and with engough forces to take out the states (probaby end up in nuklear holocaust killing everyone though)
Hitler would have illegalized marrage between none nordic people and boosted his own efforts of making the master race.
But in the end the US would have givin because they would have been in a very lage sieg. with the germans having superrior resourses he would have raped the U.S.
 

You are in such a grip of Nazi fantasy as to have made most of this incoherent. Germany's problem throughout the war was a lack of resources. The scenario you paint could only have occured if the Soviet Union were successfully invaded and defeated, and that simply was not going to happen. Germany never controlled very much of Africa, and Asia not at all. You let your imagination run away with you, and apparently because you think a Nazi victory would have been a glorious thing.

 
Oh one last thing a Naz would have been the first man on the moon (since the americans stole all the nazi rocket scientists who got them up there in the first place!

thank you all fro allowing me to get that all out.
 

I go along with Au here, it seems you idolize the Nazis--you certainly demonstate a complete lack of historical perspective, and little depth of knowledge of even the general history of the period.
 
 
This is mainly for setana (or for you excited viewers at home)

First i would like to reply to you to au1929 i am not sorry they lost i am not some half-wit red neck hick who lives in western U.S. i just like to say what i would do in different people's shoes. Also to point out idiotic mistakes.

Second i would like to thank setana for your critique of my (theory) but you didn't have to go out of your way to call me a nazi, although it may sound like it in which i wrote, i can say that you have never been farther from the truth! I am a proud citizen of Canada, which on top of that, i am a very liberal person and actually just voted for paul Martin in the recent federal elections.

Although much of what you did say in your "little" critique, do not delude yourself the nazi's more than had the capabilities to conquer most the world. Also in fact i recently watched a program on History television called "Hitlers' Briton" in which i got some facts to support my theory.

On a more personal note setana you should really tone it down a bit i was joking when i said each of your posts were like "Books" it was i joke, i was actually impressed with your knowledge of our history. i will make another post soon with a more detailed explanation of my statements, my last one was really rushed

But just to clarify.....I AM CANADIAN (Liberal) NOT A NAZI!!!

But again thanks for your very in depth critique, i hope to have more debates with you in the future

-Hans
 
 
Robert E. Heinlen
Nazis on the Moon sounds like the plot of one of Robert E. Heinlen's books.

However, failure to eliminate the Nazis from central Europe was a distinct possibility and would have been a victory for Hitler.

//BW
 
 
It never happened it was just a theory of what could have happened like i can say all of north america could have been french had france put more effort into keeping it fro the british, don't take anything i say serious
 
 
oh and by the way is that the author of the book space cadet....i read that back when i was 12

-Hans
 
 
Actually speaking of political and military follies lets have a discussion of the good ole' US of A. Is the bush government a modern Nazi regime.......na there just thick in the head lol yep that george bush is a real good laugh sometimes.......his speech has changed from "We have gone into Iraq do disarm Saddam of his" (No here is a phrase none of us will forget along with wardrobe malfunction) "weapons of mass destruction"(or distraction hehe) to "Although we find no WOMD the invasion of Iraq was for the good of mankind" then he adds because Iraq has the capability to cause harm....well duh Bush even good ole' luxemburg can cause harm.......anyway its all clear why he went in and sacrificed 1000 of his own men.....OIL of corse!! So to all you Americans please for the good of mankind don't vote that idiot back into power!!. On a side note did you know that anyone convicted of a felony in florida was restricted from voting mouths weeks before the elections.......hmmm i smell a rat......George up to his old tricks again.

Vote for democrats please before he gets the idea that canada has weapons of mass destruction lol.(he wants our softwood timber)

-Hans
 
 
Just a little detail:

 
...then by this time I believe that Spain would have seen the weakness of the allied armies and therefore allie Franco would have allied with Germany.
 

1) Spain has never been an ally of the US, the UK, Canada etc. 2) Franco wanted to become an ally of Hitler and fight with him; it was Hitler who refused this, because he believed Spains army was too weak. It is also believed Hitler didn't like Franco on a personal level.
 
 
H Goering wrote

 
I AM CANADIAN (Liberal) NOT A NAZI!!!
 

Glad you cleared that up H. Goering. Its not easy to tell the difference sometimes. Especially at this time of year when all those toothy-grin maple leaf toting Canadian back packers invade London. They can so easily be mistaken for waffen ss (Canadian Liberal branch)  
 
 
Generally, the home-grown variety of your nasty stereotype is that the half-wit redneck hick lives in the southern United States--although i'm sure that the members here who inhabit the western states will be charmed by your assumption. It's nonsense, of course, whether one imagines such hicks in the south or the west--hicks are to be found everywhere, including Canada.

Liberal? What the hell is that supposed to mean? I've rarely seen a more plutocratic parliamentary government than has been expressed by the alternation of Tory and Liberal in Canada. Had you said you were a New Democrat, i might have believed you to have a valid distinction between your politics and the smoke and mirrors of American politics. But any Canadian liberal or "Progressive Conservative" can make little distinction, to my mind, between themselves and the two main parties in this country.

Finally, my apologies for having assumed that you were one of the many starry-eyed, "Gee, those Nazis were so cool, they coulda won" crowd that we get here--but your thesis was so facile, and seems so ill-informed, that it appeared to me no other than a fond daydream.
 
 
Thanks for the info Rick i always thought Hitler was desperate for help and would have taken anyone for help, but i guess i was wrong, but hey you learn something new every day.

Steve your a funny guy, how's the weather up in jolly good ole' London??

Ahh Setanta always good to hear from my most lovable critic...Ya sorry about the western US zing it just kind rolled out and you are right our hicks are prodomanitly in alberta and british columbia.

As for the differences in between our parties, i am sorry to say you are wrong. First of all we have more "variety" we have the (New Conservative party), (The Liberal Party), (the New democratic Party), (le Bloc Quebecois) en Quebec, and the Green party. I know you have more than 2 options to but each of our parties have almost equal chances of winning either a minority or majority except maybe the Green party. Second even our most conservative party aka the New Concervative party is very much more left wing then your democratic party.

-Hans
 
 
I have been looking at previous posts and i have a very interesting question. My question is if Rudolph Hess was in prision from the 10th of may 1941 until the war ended in 45 why did he go to jail when not a whole lot of fighting had been done and the jews hadn't been exterminated in full force therefore leaving him with very few atrocities against him?? I suspect setanta will answer this question.

-Hans
 
 
You suspect wrong. You also either didn't get the implication of my statement, or you willfully ignored it. I am conversant with the history of the New Democratic party, originating from the Cooperative Commonwealth Federation amalgamated with the Labour Congress. I am also well aware that the Tories, despite calling themselves "Progressive Conservatives," are just as right-wing as the Republican party in the U.S. I am further not so naive as not to see that the Liberals are no more left-wing than the Democrats in the U.S.--which is to say, not at all.

As i mentioned previously, Canada's parliamentary history since 1867 is one of a government far more influenced by plutocratic policies than was ever the case in the United States before the election of Ronald Reagan. I am never impressed with arguments advanced by Canadians about the "liberality" of their governments, and find it hilarious when Americans call it a socialist state. Canadian parliaments have rushed to kiss corporate ass faster than a puck in a slap shot... please spare me the high tone about Canajun politics...
 
 
Alright then i guess i don't know facts about my own country and just 3 weeks ago voted without knowing a damn thing. pure ingnorance on my part.....

-Hans
 
 
alright were not talkin about canada of america here so lets get back on topic, i'm sorry i was wrong about all i said.

-Hans
 
 
Please note, i'm not saying you're wrong... i'm saying that, in my opinion, you're wrong...
 
 
hehe guess i should defend my views more rigorously, but still we should get back on topic. Can you answer my question about Hess??
 
 
No i cannot. Another member and i discussed Hess a few days ago. No one knows for certain what motivated Hess, unless they're English and were in contact with him in 1940. In that case, you can bet whoever that may be, they're not talking. Rudolf himself ain't talkin', either...
 
 
 
Rudolf himself ain't talkin', either...
 

To us, Set, to us...
 
 
I wonder whether any DNA testing was ever carried out on Hess to lay to rest the rumours that he was actually an impostor and that the real Hess was shot down over the North Sea on Hitler's orders.
 
 
There seems little doubt he was Hess. (Besides, even Albert Speer, who spent 20 years in Spandau with Hess, thought it was Hess.) (Well, some Neo-Nazis have [had] such on their websites.)
 
 
Hans

Weather in London? Like the web Wet Warm Windy
 
 
Re: If Hitler had been smart, would Germany have won?

 
If Hitler had been smart, would Germany have won?
 

well, the question doesn't arise and is absurd.

If he had won, how many peoples still dies?
His ideology was absolutly wrong and he possesed no comeptencies.
 
 
When Hitler came into power, Germany had already lost?
 
 
Yes, only a few years after 1933 the Jewish taken to the concentration camp.
And he accommodate all the money to armaments industry. So the economy continuinged falls down.
 
 
Germany had lost nothing in 1933--the Versaille-mandated reparations had been paid, because Weimar had "bitten the bullet" economically, and was made the fall guy for that hardship. There was no war to win or lose until Hitler came to power and began the process to implement his idiotic plans for conquering the Ukraine.
 
 
Uh-ha.
 
 
 
Germany had lost nothing in 1933
 

Not in 1933, but some later.
 
 
That's also what Setanta seems to mean Thok.
 
 
We know it was Hess who flew in the uk because he was in the Nuremburg trials what i want to know is on what charges was he arrested after the war. I believe ole rudolph died in the early 80's.

-Hans
 
 
Rudolf Walter [hell :wink: ] Richard Hess died [suicide] in Berlin on Aug. 17, 1987, aged 92

Count I [Conspiracy to Wage Aggressive War] : Indicted; Guilty
Count II [Waging Aggressive War, or "Crimes Against Peace"]:Indicted; Guilty
Count III [War Crimes]: Indicted; Not Guilty
Count IV [Crimes Against Humanity] Indicted; Not Guilty
 
 
How many years was he sentenced though?

-Hans
 
 
Lifelong
 
 
Well is that actual life or what we call a life sentence (usually 25 years)?

-Hans
 
 
When I remember correctly, it WAS life... and wasn't changed to "life" (which starts in Germnay after 15 years).
 
 
It's not true that Hitler was an idiot. To dismiss him as such is folly. In order to prevent future Hitler's we need to study and analyze him. Not dismiss or ignore him and his legacy. It is true however that he was a megalomaniac bend on world domination. He's ego was such that he believed himself a better commander than his most able generals. After the defeat in Stalingrad in 1943 he made himself chef of staff, a lucky break for the allies. Any general who opposed him was normally carted off on sick leave. His treatment of the great Menstein and Rommel are testament to his increasing frustrations at losing the war. He ended up surrounded by yes men who fled the bunker like rats at the first sign of a Russian T34.

I do believe that if he had let his general's command, Germany may have avoided defeat in 1945. Even after the reversal at Stalingrad, Germany was still in a commanding position on the Eastern front. It was Hitler decision to commit most of his armour (and nearly all of his new Tiger tanks) to a suicidal frontal advance at Kursh sealed Germany and the third Reighs fate. Whereas the Russians could replace armour and men, the Germans could not. He also insisted on setting defensive positions that were to be held to the last man and bullet. This robbed the German army of flexibility and allowed their positions to be surrounded and destroyed.

The War on the western front was always a side show for the Germans. They knew that the war would be won or lost in the east. Hitler was fully aware of this also but he had neither the understanding nor ability needed to command whole army's. How could he? He never got further than corporal and spent the great war as a runner, dodging bullets in no mans land.

Hitler made the mistake of believing his own propaganda. He saw himself as some sort of a messiah to the German people. After his early victories in Poland and France he saw the German war machine as invincible. He was a believer of divine providence and honestly thought God was on his side. It was a big mistake and one we should all be grateful for.
 
 
The Axis would never won it.
It is too impossible for them to conquer the whole world even though them had accomplished it, but only for a while....

How about several "world" revolution?
 
 
Was Hitler smart? Yes

Otherwise he wouldnt have been able to do what he did.....that and he had a lot of charisma that won people over...or moreso instilling confidence in millions of people

If you want to get technical....his estimated IQ was 141....which i'm sure played a role in some of his reign and the way that he did things....

My opinion? as was already mentioned....he was too aggressive, too fast....

Many People, believe that this was largely due to Hitler's Methamphetamine use.....He was reported to have gotten an injection of Methamphetamine daily...which he also made readily available to his soldiers so they can be awake longer and have more energy to fight and have to eat less.....

Altogether...thank goodness everything happened as it did and all the horror that was the holocaust was put to an end
 
 
Hitler is lucky, maybe more luckier than us
Oh at least Hitler are still alive  

At least we remember him. His a historical man now
and will be marked at our history forever.

And what a life he had.

Maybe he was lucky  
 
 
 
It would have taken a sane and rational thinker and military mind to know when to stop and rule instead of conquer.
Hilter did not have such a mind.
 

It's exactly that. Economically and militarily wise it is fairly easy to "calculate" the balance between the axis and allies. That has been done over and over again and the outcome is always the same: no, Hitler could not have won the war.

There are exceptions, but these views always stop analysing the events at a certain moment, e.g. after Hitler invaded Austria. And even then scholars will not call it a final victory. Why not? Because, regarding Hitler, we do not let us to accept any other result than either total victory or defeat.

So that leaves us with two simple questions:
1. Could Hitler have conquered the World? Answer: no.
2. Why did Hitler try to conquer the World?: Answer: because he wanted to.

Related questions like, "did he have a sound plan of attack" or "did he realise he did not have the means to conquer the World", are open for discussions, but on the latter one: yes, there is enough proof he did realise. Even before 1942.

Go figure.
 
 
 
his estimated IQ was 141
 

Where did this come from?
 
 
Given that what is known as the intelligence quotient actually measures aculturation, as opposed to providing any coherent statement about relative intelligence, who gives a shit?
 
 
Mummy and Daddy Hitler?
 
 
Possibly...
 
 
 
Finland was an ally on in so far as they wanted help to throw the Soviets out of their country. Having reached their 1938 borders, they refused to advance any further, and nothing the Germans could do would alter that. They'd have made a pact with Satan himself to get the Soviets out, but they were dedicated to their own sense of justice in the matter, and invasion of the Soviet Union was simply not on the table.

 

Finland entered a military alliance with Germany as late as 1944 after pressure from Ribbendrop. Before that Germany and Finland were just "brothers-in-arms" (whether Hitler thought more or not). Finland waking their own war and giving miltary access to Germany. And Finland did cross their old borders in some areas over lake laatokka by many kilometers actually. Some people in Finland had a dream of "big" Finland if Germany won the war against Russia. The probelm was could Finland co-exist with Germany. And dont forget that half-a-Finlands defence was in the hands of Germanys mountain divisions consisting of some 200,000 men and they did gross Finlands old borders in Lappland also. Finland refused to help Germany in taking Leningrad though and refused to advance beyond their old borders in the Kannas region.
 
 
I assume that you are referring to Lake Ladoga, as it is commonly spelled in English. Kannas means absolutely nothing to me, could you clarify that? I know of the traditional name of Karelia for the area between the Neva and Finnland. Whether or not there were those who wished for a "Greater Finnland," actions speak louder than words, and the Finns basically acted to insure the integrity of their pre-1938 borders.
 
 
 
I assume that you are referring to Lake Ladoga, as it is commonly spelled in English. Kannas means absolutely nothing to me, could you clarify that? I know of the traditional name of Karelia for the area between the Neva and Finnland. Whether or not there were those who wished for a "Greater Finnland," actions speak louder than words, and the Finns basically acted to insure the integrity of their pre-1938 borders.
 

Yes, i meant Lake Ladoga. Kannas (i dont think it has an English name) is between Lake Ladoga and the Gulf of Finland. And again Finland advanced way over their old borders north of Lake Ladoga (in some parts over 100 kilometers) hoping that Germany would win the Soviet Union and Finland could keep those new borders.
 
 
Well, i've not read that, but i also have no reason to dispute it, so i'll take your word for it.

 

From the Russian web-site,  www.karelia.ru,  a map indicating the contemporary area known as Karelia. Historically, the region around the outlet of the Neva and extending along the coast to Narva and beyond was known as Ingria.
 
 
First Finlands goal was to achieve pre-winter war borders. So you are right about that. But after they saw that they are actually advancing pretty well, they went even further than that in hope of uniting all of Karelia and Finnish-related regions into Finland. They fell a little short of that though.
 
 
 
First Finlands goal was to achieve pre-winter war borders. So you are right about that. But after they saw that they are actually advancing pretty well, they went even further than that in hope of uniting all of Karelia and Finnish-related regions into Finland. They fell a little short of that though.
 

Although there were stupid nationalists on all sides, the military objective of crossing the old borders was not to conquer more territory, but to threathen the railway link between Murmansk and Moscow and undoubtedly that was intended to be a negotiation trump.

However, since the Soviets had no intention on reneging on their claims to Finnish territory (and make piece with Finland to fight the Germans, which is what the Finnish leadership hoped), the Finns were driven into the arms of the Germans, who were the only ones (apart from Sweden) to offer support, in men and material. As for the Western Allies, they declared war on Finland to placate Stalin.
 
 
 
As for the Western Allies, they declared war on Finland to placate Stalin.
 

The United States of America was in the western alliance, and they never declared war on Finland. However Great Britain for example declared war on Finland. USA helped the Soviet Union during Continuation War with supplies though. In some occations these supplies were misdropped and Finns got to use them and it helped them a great deal.
 
 
And sorry that I presented assumptions as facts. I always thought that Finns wanted more territory in hope that Germany won. The attack phase was in 1941 and Continuation War ended in 1944. So its kind of weird to think that Finnish high command knew already in 1941 that they(and the Germans) were going to lose the war and were thinking about negotiation trumps. But I dont doubt that either. Stratetical significance of that railway track was without a doubt great.

And if you mean that the Soviets would have agreed to make peace after Finlands attack, i dont think that Finnish high command wouldnt have seen that in their wildest dreams.

And I also could have misunderstanded that sentence  
 
 
...won? What?

Best breed at Crufts?
The world Cup?

get a grip man, tell us what he might have won (in your opinion) had he been smart.

And for your information he was not un-smart.
 
 
Well Hitler made many good decisions and just few errors. Those few errors were just too decisive for the WWII. So he was rather smart. Everybody makes mistakes. We are just human  
 
 
I'd be interested to know what you consider his "good decisions" to have been.
 
 
Of course there were the paths he chose in political field with the exception of the muenich beer hall putch(?). How he brought the NSDAP party up and became chancellor. Than of course in the military field he chose to attack France through Ardennes. He also knew how to gain more territory for the Third Reich with peaceful means prior to the war. So he had diplomatic skills in that way. And aiding Franco in the Spanish civil war was too a good decision. German troops gained battle experience and because of that were superior early in the war. Alliance with Japan was also a good decision. Only Japan didnt help Germany much because of their own plans of world conquest. For example if Japan attacked the Soviet Union together with Germany, the Soviets would have been in trouble. The winter-equipped divisions the Soviets pulled from the Japanese border, wouldnt have been able to come for Moskows defence and the Germans might have taken Moscow. If that would have happened, the morale of the Soviets would have fallen down and the Operation Barbarossa might have been succesful and thus a good decision. The Japanese were just too megalomanic with their world conquest plans called the Tanaka memorial given to the Emperor in 1927. Of course the Japanese got stuck with the second step of world conquest. China. And when that didnt go as planned, they continued with other steps. But for some reason skipped the step where they would have conquered East-Russia and went of with conquering pacific islands and Southeast-Asia and of course attacking the USA. But as for Hitler he did do some good decisions.
 
 
BM
 
 
2 key reasons why Hitler lost.

1. He, by that i mean the german military, only planned for and expected a 6 week war.

2. Hitlers obsession with bombers of all shape and sizes. not enough effort was provided for long range escorts of fighter planes, so all his precious bombers got shot down by allied fighter before reaching their targets. (this being after the battle of britan when german fighter production ran into a trickle).
 
 
 
 
First Finlands goal was to achieve pre-winter war borders. So you are right about that. But after they saw that they are actually advancing pretty well, they went even further than that in hope of uniting all of Karelia and Finnish-related regions into Finland. They fell a little short of that though.
 

Although there were stupid nationalists on all sides, the military objective of crossing the old borders was not to conquer more territory, but to threathen the railway link between Murmansk and Moscow and undoubtedly that was intended to be a negotiation trump.

However, since the Soviets had no intention on reneging on their claims to Finnish territory (and make piece with Finland to fight the Germans, which is what the Finnish leadership hoped), the Finns were driven into the arms of the Germans, who were the only ones (apart from Sweden) to offer support, in men and material. As for the Western Allies, they declared war on Finland to placate Stalin.
 

"At the initial stages of the Continuation War, when an offensive of the Karelian army towards Lake Ladoga and the River Syvri was being prepared, Mannerheim issued the Order of the Day number 4 of the Commander-in-Chief, in which he referred to his promise of 1918, to expel the Bolsheviks out of Russian Karelia, to liberate the Karelian nations and to accord to Finland a great future. He said that the Karelians? own battallions were marching in the ranks of the Finnish army, which was a reference to the so-called tribal battallions assembled in Finland.

In Mannerheim?s view, his proclamation was in accordance with the ideas of the administration of the state, reflecting even a wider public opinion. This sort of an Order of the Day, in which aspirations for territorial expansion, for Great Finland, could be read in between the lines, aroused attention ? negative as well as positive ? among the political circles both in Finland and elsewhere in the world."

 The Order of the Day of the Sword Scappard 

BTW, Finnish leadership swore allegiance to Germany until the Soviet major offensive in june of 1944 after which they had no other choice than initiate peace negotiations with the Soviet Union if they wanted to maintain independece.
 
 
These are major mistakes he made which cost him the war.

1) Going back on his agreement with Stalin and invading Russia. Even if he had won Stalingrad, the terrible conditions wiped out a lot of his army.

2)Unconditional alliance with Mussolini. Because Italy stuffed up a lot of the african campaign, Hitler had to deploy much needed troops to Africa to take back strongholds, the italians should have hld.

3) His obessession with wiping out the european jewish race. When the germans liberated the Ukraine when invading Russia, there was a huge army of ukranians ready to side with the germans to take revenge for years of russian brutality. Instead of taking advantage of this, Hitler did his standard procedure of sending a lot of the army(which was jewish) to the concnetration camps. This army would have been invaluable with manpower and also knowledge of russian conditions.
 
 
1. Declaring war on the USA! An incredible blunder.

2. NOT concentrating on a FEW good aircraft designs (Speer was NO Beaverbrook)

3. Insisting that NO ground was ever given up - this hamstrung his generals...who he ignored most of the time

4. Not by-passing Stalingrad

5. Insisting on the Me 262 being converted to a BOMBER

6. Not knocking out the Chain Home and Chain Home Low stations in 1940, and mismanagement of the Battle of Britain through Goering

7. Cancellation of the Ural Bomber project

The list is endless.............thank goodness!
 
 
Hitler's greatest mistake was in the power granted to the SS. The existing civil service was gradually replaced by the arms of the SS as the war went on and factions within the SS fought each other to achieve more and more power.

It became harder and harder for the country / economy to be run as the SS became more involved Germany became less efficient.

A similiar thing happened to the armed forces. Soldiers loyalties began to be pulled all over the place as the SS began to mesh themselves into the chain of command.

I don't have the reference in front of me at present but I read a book on the allied capture Bridge at Rentmagen (sp?) that detailed the chain of command that the officer in charge of the bridge had to work with and it was crazy.
 
 
The problem at Remagen was the there were no resources to destroy the bridge. The corps command (which i believe was LXXXIVth Corps) simply had no resources to respond, and at the bridge itself, there were insufficient explosives, and those which were available were industrial grade, not military grade. Your statement about the Remagen bridge is a naive oversimplification of a complex situation. More than anything else, Lt. Timmerman's men were willing to make the sacrifices necessary to get across the bridge, while the Germans simply were going to pieces, and unable to effectively respond.

I consider your remarks about the SS to be ill-informed as well.
 
 
I just checked my facts (always a good thing to do). The area of responsibility was LXVIIth Corps. General Botsch, who had until recnetly commanded LXVIIth Corps, had only recently taken command of LXXXth Corps, and had not had the opportunity to brief his successor on the bridge and it's defenses. The local commander was Captain Bratge, and the bridge itself was in the command of an engineer, Captain Friesenhahn, who was unaware that most of the charges had not been placed. He only became aware of this when he checked on his own initiative on the morning of March 7, 1945, as the 27th Armored Infantry Battalion, Combat Command B, 9th Armored Division entered Remagen. Capt. Friesenhahn was in a tunnel in the Erpeler Ley, across the Rhine. When, at about 12:30 p.m., he was informed that the Americans were in possession of most of Remagen, he tried to blow the approach causeway to the Ludendorf Bridge, but only partially succeeded, and then learned by personal inspection that he had only industrial grade explosives. Lt. Karl Timmerman (who had been born nearby, ironically) lead his Company A into Remagen, and secured the approaches to the bridge. When Brig. Gen. Hoge, commanding CCB, learned that the bridge was standing, he ordered the 27th to seize the bridge. Timmerman's company was badly bled-down, and although their casualties were not heavy, they still only managed to put 15 men across the bridge. But they hung on, and even though the Germans had nominally 200 men in the Erpeler Ley tunnel, many were Volksturm, and many of the rest were demoralized and unwilling to fight. Both Capt. Bratge and Capt. Friesenhahn had been wounded in the fighting for the bridge approaches and the bridge, and they eventually surrendered.

In March of 1945, neither LXVIIth Corps nor LXXXth Corps existed as coherent military organizations, their component units existed on paper, but it was a toss-up whether any particular unit existed on the ground. The chain of command of any German unit was very coherent and efficient--but without troops, a chain of command is meaningless. By the spring of 1945, few German divisions could muster even a battalion strength, and even those units often lacked basic arms, ammunition and supplies.

You have a grossly inflated view of the significance of the SS.
 
 
 
You have a grossly inflated view of the significance of the SS.
 

Kaldish has indeed.
 
 
I did say that I didn't have my Remagen book to hand   and I did not blame the chain of command for the failure to blow the bridge but my weak and feeble memory suggests that Bratge was under orders from something other than LXXXth Corps.

I still stand by the SS replacing the civil service and making it less efficient

Hans Buchheim "3rd Reich - its beginnings, developments, its end" published as "Der dritte reich" in 1958

Ill paraphrase to prevent typing pages...

The first political assignment undertaken by the SS was race and resettlement. This was a police power and gave way to an SS political police. The head of this was linked to the SS Reichfurher which took power away from the ministry of the interior and handed it to the SS. The transfer of police powers to the SS away from the Ministry of the Interior until the summer of 1943 when it was fully taken over by the SS.

The furher would inform a regular administrative agency that its function was being taken by a special deputy who was subordinate and directly responsible to Hitler. In time the super structures conflicts with the traditional government led to a chaos of overlapping competances - of functions that duplicated and cancelled each other.

- thats what I was trying to say - that letting the SS loose in the inner workings of government was a huge mistake. Well a mistake anyway if 'grossly inflated' is correct.  
 
 
 
I still stand by the SS replacing the civil service and making it less efficient
[/b]

 

As far as I recall Buchheim (I only read the German version), he said that the police forces became a SS-infested civil service.
Which certainly is true.
 
 
Bratge had no orders concerning the Ludendorf bridge, and both he and Friesenhahn were certainly not acting under orders from LXXXth Corps--they were in the LXVIIth Corps area of responsibility. My remarks were in response to your statement that: "... but I read a book on the allied capture Bridge at Rentmagen (sp?) that detailed the chain of command that the officer in charge of the bridge had to work with and it was crazy." I have disputed this on the basis that German command control was crumbling all along the western front.

As for the paraphrase which you have supplied, it makes no distinction between the authority of the Gauleiters in newly acquired territories (there were five such "gauen" administered by these appointees) and the growing power which Himmler acquired by inserting the SS into police districts within the gauen, and only much later in the Landen into which the rest of Germany was administratively divided. This was internal politicking, and has little to do with the lack of competence of the Gauleiters and the other administrative officials of the NSDAP.

The question of this thread is whether or not Germany could have won the war had Hitler been "smart." Apart from the rather vague concept of what makes someone "smart," the obvious answer is that the war itself was not a "smart" idea, and once Churchill was installed with a National Union government, and the Soviet Union was invaded, the only question was how long it would take Germany to lose. In your paraphrase you jump from remarks about the police powers which Himmler engrossed for the SS to a statement about "a chaos of overlapping competances (that should read competancies )." The very incompetence of NSDAP officials assured the eventual disintegration of the machinery of state. Competent individuals such as Milch, and brilliant individual such as Speer served to delay the day of reckoning. As for the military aspect of the war, the excellence of the command system, and the Frederician emphasis on individual initiative at all levels of the Wehrmacht also served to postpone the reckoning.

Once again, it is my opinion that you overrate the significance of the SS. Most of the "race settlement" actions of Himmler's organization were undertaken by a subordinate bureau of the SS, the SD, which also administered the camps. The majority of SS members were in fact engaged in direct combat with Germany's enemies, and were widely recruited in the occupied territories--i have read estimates that 50,000 of the Dutch served in the SS, and there was a French SS Charlemagne division. The SS was not a simple, monolithic organization. I think that you are correct to view their influence as significant, and you might engage in further study of the organization, and the growth of its power as Himmler worked to extend his "turf." I do not for a moment believe that the defeat of Germany can be laid at the door of the SS, however.
 
 
It is entirely possible that Hitler could have won the second the world war. Probably the biggest blow to his war effort was his failure to invade Britain. Adverse weather conditions halted him from launching operation Sea Lion, at subsequenlty, the war against the UK was fought in the skies in the Battle of Britain. However, if Hitler had succeeded in landing troops in Britain and eventually occupying it, this would have effetively ended the war in Europe and meant victory for Hitler for a number of reasons.

1. As Britain was the only nation in Europe not occupied by the Germans, it served as the launching base for all allied operations in Europe. If it had been occupied by Hitler's forces, the D-Day invasions could not have been launched, nor could any other allied landing operations.

2. Britain served as the main supplier of equipment for the resistance movements throughout Europe. If Britain had been occupied, it would have meant the end of effective resistance throughout Europe.

3. If America had still become involved in the war, it's only logical chance of landing in occupied Europe would have been through the south. Given that Britain was occupied and there was no chance of an allied landing operation in the north, he could have turned his active divisions in Normandy and Pas de Calais against the troops coming up through Italy and other areas in the south.

4. Probably what is most important is that Britain helped delay Hitler's invasion of the Soviet Union by launching a counter-attack through Greece against the Italian army. Hitler was forced to send troops to re-enforce Mussolini, and as a result, Operation Barbarossa was launched six-weeks later than originally planned. Hitler's troops ran into the brutal conditions of Russian seasonal weather. Eventually, the Russian winter forced his army to a halt at Stalingrad, and it was there that the war turned against him. If he had been able to launch Barbarossa on time, the wehrmacht would have had enough time to push all the way to Moscow without being delayed by the winter. It's likely Russia would have fallen within eight or ten weeks.

Essentially, the invasion of Britain would have assured victory for Hitler in Europe. As for the United States, the wisest course of action would have been for Germany to appeal to the U.S. for the signing of some sort non-agression agreement. However, if Germany had declared war on America, WWII would likely have dragged on for much longer. Germany did not have the capacity, nor a suitable launching base for landing troops on American soil. However, they had developed long-range bombers, v-2 rockets, and battleships which could have been used to hit the eastern and southern coast of the United States, and it's most likely that long, drawn out air and sea war would have ensued.

Eventually, with the advent of atomic weapons, the air and sea war would probably cease and America and Germany would most likely be caught in a nuclear standoff, the ending of which is anyone's guess.
 
 
Nonsense--Germany was doomed from the time they crossed the border into Poland.
 
 
Welcome to A2K, prometheus13.

You represent there a - mildly spoken - very singular view of Germany during WWII.
 
 
I'm sorry. I don't quite understand what you mean by singular point of view.

As for the issue of crossing the Polish Border, I agree that ultimately going to war with Russia was a foolish decision, but that doesn't rule our the possibility of a successful invasion. The main reason for the failure of the invasion was the poor timing. Hitler had planned to launch the invasion in May, but it didn't happen until June. Still, the German Army managed to advance as far Leningrad and Stalingrad, but because the winter slowed them down, this gave Stalin enough time to regroup his forces and mount a counter-attack at Stalingrad. If the wehrmacht had continued to advance, they most likely would have overwhelmed the Red Army.
 
 
And I'm sorry that I couldn't find a second such opinion.
 
 
I'm sorry, but my lingusitic skills are not the best and I still fail to grasp your point. I'm not mocking you, I really just wish to know what you're telling me.
 
 
 
As for the issue of crossing the Polish Border, I agree that ultimately going to war with Russia was a foolish decision, but that doesn't rule our the possibility of a successful invasion. The main reason for the failure of the invasion was the poor timing. Hitler had planned to launch the invasion in May, but it didn't happen until June. Still, the German Army managed to advance as far Leningrad and Stalingrad, but because the winter slowed them down, this gave Stalin enough time to regroup his forces and mount a counter-attack at Stalingrad. If the wehrmacht had continued to advance, they most likely would have overwhelmed the Red Army.
 

When Germany invaded Poland, they forced France and Britain to declare war on them. The Soviet Union subsequently invaded Poland as well, to erect a buffer between themselves and Germany. That the military response of France and Britain was initially pathetic does not alter the fact that Hitler had attempted to annex Poland, and present it to the rest of Europe as a fait accompli from which Poland's erstwhile allies would then back down. He badly misjudged the English. Although the allies missed a golden opportunity during the "sitzkrieg," they eventually got their act together, and put of a pretty good fight in Norway, despite the logistical difficulties they faced, and the logistical advantages which the Germans enjoyed in that campaign. As it was, the German navy sacrificed nearly their entire destroyer force in the fight for Narvik. Each further step down the road of war took them that much closer to destruction. Hitler was a good judge of gutter politics, as i have mentioned time and again, and he correctly judged the lack of will on the part of Le Brun and Chamberlain in the 1938 Czech fiasco. But he was completely unable to understand the British, and what their reaction would be to the fall of France. Churchill mystified and enraged him.

That war with the Soviet Union was inevitable should not be doubted: Hitler had already told in Mein Kampf of his plans to find "living space" for the German people in the Ukraine, and Stalin accepted it as a given that the Germans would invade. Recently released documents show that Stalin believe such an invasion would come in 1943, and was therefore caught unprepared, while he was fighting the Finns and the Japanese. (See Stalin: The Court of the Red Tsar, Simon Montefiore.)

The title of this thread suggests that a "smart" Hitler could have won that war. I consider that nonsense. With the invasion of Poland, Hitler assured that Roosevelt would eventually find a way to come into the war against Germany. That Hilter was not smart, and in fact was stupid, is evinced by his declaration of war on the United States after the Japanese attack on Hawaii. Had he done nothing, Roosevelt would have had to play a waiting game, seeking a provocation for a declaration of war on Germany. Admiral King and Admiral Kimmel were wrangling over ship assignments in the Atlantic and the Pacific even before the United States entered the war, because the administration was actively helping the Canadians to patrol the northwest Atlantic, so as to get the convoys through to England. When the English decided to go after and sink Bismark, American Coast Guard search aircraft, operating out of England tracked her down. American Coast guard weather ships left their stations to track Bismark so that the English would not lose her. The United States was already involved in that war in 1940, and American naval officers in the Atlantic sourly referred to it as "waging neutrality." Our "lend-lease" agreement with England gave the United States control of the English naval bases in the Carribean, the purpose of which would be to establish forward bases to combat the German submarines which would inevitably attack American coastal shipping. The Boeing 299, which became the Army Air Force's B-17, was shipped to England before we entered the war (although their pilots did not like it, and the asked for no more of them). The United States routinely sold Curtis Kittyhawk and Tomahawk fighters to Canada, which were then shipped in their original crates to England.

It is not justifiable in my opinion to suggest that the Germans could have taken Moscow, even if they had launched their invasion on the originally scheduled time table. German armored vehicles were not designed to operate in those conditions, and the example of Leningrad strongly suggests that they could not have successfully laid seige to Moscow even if they had made it that far. Stalin was able to transfer troops from the far east to confront the Germans because the Japanese had negotiated an armistice with the Soviets--which just underlines what an idiot Hitler was to delcare war on the United States on behalf of his Japanese "allies," who did absolutely nothing for the Germans in that war. The Germans were not prepared for the winter of 1941-42. Their vehicles were not winterized, their troops were not supplied with winter clothing, they made no effort to improve the road network on which their communications depended in anticipation of the coming winter.

After Napoleon defeated Kutusov at Borodino in 1812, he waited around for a day to accept the surrender of Moscow. It never happended. While his badly battered army licked its wounds, and he wrote yet another phoney bulletin, Kutusov marched right through Moscow, past the Kremlin and across the river. When the bridges over the Moscva became jammed with civilian as well as military carts, he lined up his artillery, restored order, and then allowed one civilian vehicle to cross after each military vehicle. Kutusov then moved by his left to put himself between Moscow and his base of supply in the south. When Napoleon finally entered Moscow, there were, perhaps, 10,000 people left in a city which had held two days before, more than a million souls. Most of those left were the aged, the homeless, the infirm and the insane. It is a mistake to believe that taking Moscow would have resulted in a German victory any more than that was true for Napoleon. By the way, the Germans did not reach Stalingrad and the Volga river until the late summer of 1942, they were no where near it in 1941.

In 1708, Charles XII of Sweden marched into Russia. He could have moved by the Baltic coast, which would have given him excellent logistic support for a move to take St. Petersburg, a city which was then only five years old. He could have moved by Novgorod thereafter to take Moscow. That likely would not have resulted in a Swedish victory, however, especially in light of the character of his opponent, Petr Alexeevitch. Instead, he foolishly placed all his bets on the renegade Cossack Hetman, Mazeppa, and marched into the Ukraine, and to his destruction at Poltava in 1709.

When Napoleon crossed the Vistula, he disposed of more than a half million troops. He could have marched by the Baltic coast on St. Petersburg as well. He would not have had control of the Baltic as Charles did in 1708, but he still would have had a short, secure supply line. Instead, he marched by Smolensk on Moscow. Along the way, he left increasingly large garrisons, because of the partisan activities of Doctorov and Davidov and a host of other Russian aristocrats who were willing to burn their own estates to deny support to the invader. When he finally reached the defensive redoubts at Shevardino, he tried in a ponderous and clumsy fashion (due to the incompetence of Jerome Bonapart, commanding his right wing) to move around Kutusov's left. Prince Bagration was a fearless and tenacious fighter who managed a brillian career without a strategic clue--even he saw through Napoleon's manoeuvre, and moved to conform. Kutusov was a lot sharper, and as soon as the French were gone from the front of the redouts at Shevardino, he rushed the rest of the army behind Bagration's line and conformed in time to meet the French attack the next day. After the long grind from Warsaw to Borodino, Napoleon's half million was reduced to about 150,000 after subtracting garrisons and "wastage" due to partisan attacks on his communications and line of march. During the day long nightmare of Borodino, the flower of the Army which had not already been sacrificed at Wagram in 1809 was destroyed. Lannes had been killed at Wagram. Desaix had died much earlier when Napoleon abandoned him in Egypt. Louis Davout was just about the only competent Marshall still commanding troops in the field for Napoleon by then, and even he could not break the Russian line. (And he was the only man i know of in history to have successfully enveloped both flanks of his enemy, even though the Prussians at Auerstadt outnumbered him two-to-one !) By the time the Army retreated back to the river Bug, there were just 10,000 men left, and those were only saved because Davout commanded the rear guard.

I do not believe that Hitler could have taken Moscow, and even if he had, i do not believe that that would have knocked Stalin out of the war. Like Charles XII before him, Hitler went off on a wild goose chase in the Ukraine, and to his eventual destruction. I don't think it matters, though. He was already doomed.
 
 
If Hitler had invaded and finished off Britain in 1941, which he could have done, not easily, but it was doable. Then Ireland, Spain, and Portugal would have dropped their pro German neutrality for more active alliances and Hitler would have been in a much better position. That does not mean that he would have won, or that he was smart, but he would have had more options.
 
 
 
I'm sorry. I don't quite understand what you mean by singular point of view.

As for the issue of crossing the Polish Border, I agree that ultimately going to war with Russia was a foolish decision, but that doesn't rule our the possibility of a successful invasion. The main reason for the failure of the invasion was the poor timing. Hitler had planned to launch the invasion in May, but it didn't happen until June. Still, the German Army managed to advance as far Leningrad and Stalingrad, but because the winter slowed them down, this gave Stalin enough time to regroup his forces and mount a counter-attack at Stalingrad. If the wehrmacht had continued to advance, they most likely would have overwhelmed the Red Army.
 

I dont really believe that the wehrmacht could ever have overwhelmed the Red Army. Atleast overwhelmed is not the right word. As long as the Japanese didnt have a chance occupying the Trans-Siberian Railroad Germany didnt stand a chance. And as it was seen in 1939, the Japanese couldnt launch an effective offensive against the Soviet Union while waging war against China. If however Japan could have concentrated their efforts against Soviet Russia and conquerd the Trans-Siberian Railload, Pacific Russia would have fallen. That together with the German push in west would have meant the collapse of Soviet Russia. But as it turned out Japan and Germany didnt attack Soviet Union simultaneously which was a great fault and alltogether odd because of the antikomintern pact. So if Germany would have pushed even further east, there would have just been millions or atleast hundreds of thousands of new recruits from Mongolia and other eastern parts of the Soviet Union.

So to conclude, Germany couldnt have overwhelmed the Soviet Union without significant Japanese support. And as it was seen, the Soviets werent eager to surrender so I think they would have kept on fighting even after the loss of Leningrad, Moscow and Stalingrad. But after the loss of those cities, the Wehrmacht could have easily pushed to the line of OKWs attack plan. (the Astrakan-Volga-Archangelsk line) And maybe then would have Stalin agreed to make peace with Hitler. But in a long war it all comes to resources and manpower, two things in which Germany didnt stand a chance against the Soviet Union plus the wehrmacht was also busy in the west and south. German plan of blitzkrieg just didnt work in so long distances. And it seems that the goals of operation Barbarossa were impossible to achieve. Maybe the success early in the war blinded Hitler but I dont think that even he thought that the wehrmacht could have fought a long war against Soviet Russia. Operation Barbarossa relied too much on blitzkrieg tactics and Hitler was too sure on his quick victory over the Soviet Union which was seen in the lack of winter equipment. However I agree with you that the Soviet Union could have been beaten but that would have required Germany and Japan both competly honoring the antikomintern and tripartite pacts.

"Hitler had planned to launch the invasion in May, but it didn't happen until June. Still, the German Army managed to advance as far Leningrad and Stalingrad, but because the winter slowed them down, this gave Stalin enough time to regroup his forces and mount a counter-attack at Stalingrad."
Im not sure if I undrestand what you are saying but the offensive started in June 1941 and the 6th armee reached Stalingrad in the fall of 1942 so the wehrmacht had 1 summers to attack and they still failed to reach their objectives which they were sure to reach in a matter of weeks.
 
 
 
When Germany invaded Poland, they forced France and Britain to declare war on them. The Soviet Union subsequently invaded Poland as well, to erect a buffer between themselves and Germany. That the military response of France and Britain was initially pathetic does not alter the fact that Hitler had attempted to annex Poland, and present it to the rest of Europe as a fait accompli from which Poland's erstwhile allies would then back down. He badly misjudged the English. Although the allies missed a golden opportunity during the "sitzkrieg," they eventually got their act together, and put of a pretty good fight in Norway, despite the logistical difficulties they faced, and the logistical advantages which the Germans enjoyed in that campaign. As it was, the German navy sacrificed nearly their entire destroyer force in the fight for Narvik. Each further step down the road of war took them that much closer to destruction. Hitler was a good judge of gutter politics, as i have mentioned time and again, and he correctly judged the lack of will on the part of Le Brun and Chamberlain in the 1938 Czech fiasco. But he was completely unable to understand the British, and what their reaction would be to the fall of France. Churchill mystified and enraged him.
 

The only thing that disallowed Hitler to conquer England was the switch of bombing military targets to bombing civilian cities due to revenge to a German city bombing. The misjudging has nothing to do with what happened. The British thus quickly rebuilt their entire Air Force.

Hitler wanted the piece of Czechoslovakia for 3 reasons.

1.To throw off the west into thinking that he was going to attack east first since that's what France and Britain were hoping for due to being very weak from WWI.

2.The Sudetenland, the piece that Hitler got had an enormous percentage of Germans.

3. Czechoslovakia had THE most modern weapons including machine guns and others, and if he had attacked it, he would have been the laughing stock of Europe.

 
That war with the Soviet Union was inevitable should not be doubted: Hitler had already told in Mein Kampf of his plans to find "living space" for the German people in the Ukraine, and Stalin accepted it as a given that the Germans would invade. Recently released documents show that Stalin believe such an invasion would come in 1943, and was therefore caught unprepared, while he was fighting the Finns and the Japanese. (See Stalin: The Court of the Red Tsar, Simon Montefiore.)
 

Stalin had been preparing since the day he made the Non Aggression pact with Hitler. (Stalin was from Georgia by the way).

 
The title of this thread suggests that a "smart" Hitler could have won that war. I consider that nonsense. With the invasion of Poland, Hitler assured that Roosevelt would eventually find a way to come into the war against Germany. That Hilter was not smart, and in fact was stupid, is evinced by his declaration of war on the United States after the Japanese attack on Hawaii. Had he done nothing, Roosevelt would have had to play a waiting game, seeking a provocation for a declaration of war on Germany. Admiral King and Admiral Kimmel were wrangling over ship assignments in the Atlantic and the Pacific even before the United States entered the war, because the administration was actively helping the Canadians to patrol the northwest Atlantic, so as to get the convoys through to England. When the English decided to go after and sink Bismark, American Coast Guard search aircraft, operating out of England tracked her down. American Coast guard weather ships left their stations to track Bismark so that the English would not lose her. The United States was already involved in that war in 1940, and American naval officers in the Atlantic sourly referred to it as "waging neutrality." Our "lend-lease" agreement with England gave the United States control of the English naval bases in the Carribean, the purpose of which would be to establish forward bases to combat the German submarines which would inevitably attack American coastal shipping. The Boeing 299, which became the Army Air Force's B-17, was shipped to England before we entered the war (although their pilots did not like it, and the asked for no more of them). The United States routinely sold Curtis Kittyhawk and Tomahawk fighters to Canada, which were then shipped in their original crates to England.
 

The US didn't enter the war against Germany until Hitler had foolishly declared war on it due to the 1941 Pearl Harbor attack (Unknowingly to him, the US rebuilt their navy within a year). The US would have tried to remain neutral as said by Roosevelt himself that they would have taken George Washington's advice of "Alienating themselves of foreign alliances"

 
It is not justifiable in my opinion to suggest that the Germans could have taken Moscow, even if they had launched their invasion on the originally scheduled time table. German armored vehicles were not designed to operate in those conditions, and the example of Leningrad strongly suggests that they could not have successfully laid seige to Moscow even if they had made it that far. Stalin was able to transfer troops from the far east to confront the Germans because the Japanese had negotiated an armistice with the Soviets--which just underlines what an idiot Hitler was to delcare war on the United States on behalf of his Japanese "allies," who did absolutely nothing for the Germans in that war. The Germans were not prepared for the winter of 1941-42. Their vehicles were not winterized, their troops were not supplied with winter clothing, they made no effort to improve the road network on which their communications depended in anticipation of the coming winter.
 

The Russians had no such armistice with Japan. The only way they knew that Japan wouldn't attack them was because they had a spy there who confirmed that. The release of the entire 350,000 Russian army from guarding against a possible Japanese invasion encircled the 300,000 german army at Stalingrad.

 
After Napoleon defeated Kutusov at Borodino in 1812, he waited around for a day to accept the surrender of Moscow. It never happended. While his badly battered army licked its wounds, and he wrote yet another phoney bulletin, Kutusov marched right through Moscow, past the Kremlin and across the river. When the bridges over the Moscva became jammed with civilian as well as military carts, he lined up his artillery, restored order, and then allowed one civilian vehicle to cross after each military vehicle. Kutusov then moved by his left to put himself between Moscow and his base of supply in the south. When Napoleon finally entered Moscow, there were, perhaps, 10,000 people left in a city which had held two days before, more than a million souls. Most of those left were the aged, the homeless, the infirm and the insane. It is a mistake to believe that taking Moscow would have resulted in a German victory any more than that was true for Napoleon. By the way, the Germans did not reach Stalingrad and the Volga river until the late summer of 1942, they were no where near it in 1941.
 

The causes for Napoleon's and Hitler's attacks were two entire different scenarios. Napoleon only attacked Russia because he knew that its opposition would lead to revolt around the newly conquered continental Europe. He knew he had a good chance of losing, but he though that he would lose eventually if he didn't do it.
 
 
Hitler's only mistake was going overboard, meaning fighting in the east and fighting in the west.
Adolf could've just dealt with Russia at a later time; that was his mistake. end of storey.
 
 
The implication behind the question is that Hitler was dumb. He wasn't. Neither was he mad. He was a fanatic for sure, but he wasn't psychotic.

Hitler's undoing in my view was that he was too loyal to his foreign allies. He delayed the start of Barbarossa to pull Mussolini out of the mire in the balkans (would that have made the difference at Moscow in December 1941?), and round about the same time he supported his Japanese allies by declaring war on the United States.

If Hitler had just presented a more moderate less ideological face to Britain (Ribbentrop had been ambassador!) I think it possible after the evacuation from Dunquerk and the defeat of France, that some accommodation could be found with a British government under Halifax. Had that happened, its quite possible Hitler could have won. But Churchill was prime minsiter. Britain fought on.
 
 
 
By the way, the answer to your titular question is no.

If Hitler had been smart, he would not have invaded the Soviet Union while he already had a serious shooting war on his hands. He was committed in Norway, in North Africa and in the occupation of France, and had major assets stationed in the Pas de Calais.

Hitler was an idiot.
 

I came to this thread late and have barely read any of it but this quote of Mr Setantas is especially interesting.

Are you saying that a leader who commits troops to more areas than he should and stretches himself thin is an idiot? Hmmmmm. Interesting.
 
 
I dont think Hitler was an idiot, but he certainly allowed his fanaticism to cloud his judgement. Had he defeated the USSR by November 1941 he could have turned his attention again to Britain and probably forced some sort of deal without having to invade. Then there would have been a standoff between the USA and German- led Europe. Had it come to war, by say 1950, Germany would have intercontinental missiles and almost certainly nuclear weapons.
 
 
 
The only thing that disallowed Hitler to conquer England was the switch of bombing military targets to bombing civilian cities due to revenge to a German city bombing. The misjudging has nothing to do with what happened. The British thus quickly rebuilt their entire Air Force.
 

This smacks a great deal of "Battle of Britain" heroic mythololgy. The Royal Navy was a rather significant something "disallowing" an invasion of England. The use of air power, however, might have covered both airborne and seaborne landings--Adolf Galland proved this when as Luftwaffe fighter commander, he managed the protection of Scharnhorst, Gniesenau and Prinz Eugen as they ran the Channel in broad daylight. Who was bombing whom and for what reasons were militarily irrelevant to the fact that absolutely no contingency planning had been finalized for covering an invasion. As Kurt Student's falschirmjaeger proved on Crete, German airborne troops were prepared to make huge sacrifices to take and hold an airhead--but doing so would have required Hitler and Jodl to actually have thoroughly contemplated the ramifications of a possible invasion. To cover the invasion boats from the air required fighters, not bombers, and Hitler was obsessed with bombers and contemptuous of fighter aircraft. He was a devoted and rather clueless follower of Doheny's fantasies about crushing an opponent from the air, breaking the will of the people to fight. Both the heroic couple in Buckingham Palace, and the tough Eastenders of London demonstrated that in fact the opposite is likely to occur, hardening the resolve of the defenders. Hitler ought to have learned this lesson from the bombing of Warsaw, but the fool wasn't out to learn, he thought he knew all about military operations from his extensive service as a messenger boy in the First War.

Galland describes the operation to run the German battlecruisers through the Channel under fighter cover in his war memoir, The First and the Last. For an invasion of England to have worked, the German Navy would have had to go in harm's way with a will. German destroyers proved they were willing to make such a sacrifice in the operaitons off Narvik in 1940. Bismark dispatched Hood so quickly, that it is a reasonable proposition to suggest that the German Navy could have fought the Royal Navy to a standstill, which was all that would have been required.

The RAF were never on the ropes in the manner the Battle of Britain mythology would have us believe. Fighter squadrons in the Midlands, the North, Scotland and Northern Ireland were intact and ready for service. In the Home Counties and Kent and Sussex, the aircraft factories of Hawker and Supermarine were already moving equipment and relocating operations when the Battle of Britain began, assuring the continued manufacture of Hurricanes and Spitfires. The RAF did not even risk that much of its personnel in the campaign--about forty percent of their pilots were Polish (and 40% of aircrew casualties were Polish, as well), and another ten percent were Belgian, French, Dutch and Norwegian, along with Dominion volunteers (Canada, Australia, New Zealand and South Africa). It helps the heroic image to suggest that the RAF were near destruction in September, 1940, but it is not a true picture. Neither the nightly area bombing by the Germans, nor the same by the English over German cities, were significantly effective in destroying either the means or the will of their respective enemies to prosecute the war.

 
Hitler wanted the piece of Czechoslovakia for 3 reasons.

1.To throw off the west into thinking that he was going to attack east first since that's what France and Britain were hoping for due to being very weak from WWI.

2.The Sudetenland, the piece that Hitler got had an enormous percentage of Germans.

3. Czechoslovakia had THE most modern weapons including machine guns and others, and if he had attacked it, he would have been the laughing stock of Europe.
 

Your first contention is complete chimera. That the English and French military establishments were starved is not to be wondered at, both nations had been obliged to release as many men as possible in 1919, to assuage public opinion. In both nations, politicians pandered to public sentiment with talk of disarming from 1918 onward. A great many people in Europe longed for such a circumstance from the end of the First War. The Germans differed because they had bought--hook, line and sinker--the Ludendorf betrayal myth, which contended that the German Army had not been defeated in the field, but had been sold out by politicians and bureaucrats. Part of Hilter's appeal, and a core necessity of his bellicose rhetoric was to be seen as a militarist. When the Allies were obliged to send so many men home in 1919, they unwisely relied upon the Freikorps to "keep the peace" in the Baltic region, and this only convinced the German people all the more that their Army had been invincible, but had been sold out. Hitler rolled into the Rhineland on the heels of the departing French as though he had driven them out; then he effected the aunchluss with Austria, and promised to create a Greater Germany. He was politically committed to this program--neither sound military policy nor intricate strategems ever played a part in his thinking.

Which leads us to your second point. The "Sudeten" Germans had never been part of Germany, and had always been residents of Bohemia. There had been some noise about uniting them with Germany in Paris in 1919, but it was quickly brushed aside, and the German-speaking population of Czechoslovakia quickly came to appreciate living in a relative prosperous and stable country as they looked at the chaos of Germany in the 1920's. The very term "Sudentenland" is a politically manufactured term which only came into being at the end of the First War.

Your third statement is a sweeping generality which would not stand up to detailed scrutiny. Czechoslovakia certainly had modern manufacturing facilities, it was a part of their prosperity, and this region had been the manufacturing heartland of the old Austro-Hungarian Dual Monarchy before is dissolution at the end of the war. In point of fact, however, the best light infantry machine gun available at the time was Italian, the best, most modern armored vehicles were French, and Supermarine's Spitfire and Hawker's Hurricane were both able to perform with the Messerschmitt 109, and were newer models. No single nation had a lock on the best new equipment. It is not unreasonable to suggest that Germany would have paid heavily if they had invaded Czechoslovakia and the Czechs had made a stand, but they still would have overwhelmed them. The very reason that Czechoslovakia caved in was because Hitler had correctly judged the spineless character of Neville Chamberlain and of LeBrun. The Czechs knew they couldn't go it alone. You're confusing cause and effect.

 
Stalin had been preparing since the day he made the Non Aggression pact with Hitler. (Stalin was from Georgia by the way).
 

That Stalin considered war with Germany inevitable is not to be doubted. That he had "been preparing" for such a war is hardly supported by the evidence, however. He was in 1939 fighting both the Finns and the Japanese, and the Red Army was in a shambles at the command level due to the purges. I am quite well aware of the origins of Josef Dugashvilli.

 
The US didn't enter the war against Germany until Hitler had foolishly declared war on it due to the 1941 Pearl Harbor attack (Unknowingly to him, the US rebuilt their navy within a year). The US would have tried to remain neutral as said by Roosevelt himself that they would have taken George Washington's advice of "Alienating themselves of foreign alliances"
 

You need to read the passage of mine which you quoted again, and try to understand what i am saying. Both Roosevelt and Marshall had Europe on their minds as the principle theater in a war they both considered inevitable. Roosevelt did all that he could in conjunction with Marshall and King to support the English war effort against Germany, without involving the Congress or securing a declaration of war. And for your information, in his final state of the union message to Congress, Washington advised them to "avoid foreign entanglements."

Your remarks suggest that the American Navy was destroyed at Pearl Harbor and had to be rebuilt. Given that we are discussing Hitler, who had no clue about naval operations, and did his best to avoid the subject, your remark is rather a non sequitur. It is also as naive as the contention the the RAF faced destruction in the Battle of Britain. The great tragedy of Pearl Harbor was the loss of life. The old battleships which were attacked were quickly replaced because they were 20 to 30 years old, and new construction had already begun to replace them. The Japanese missed the American carriers altogether, and that was their eventual downfall. In fact, so much naval shipping had been diverted to the Atlantic by December, 1941, that Kimmel was constantly complaining to King that his best assets were being taken from him, and that he was increasingly unprepared to face the Japanese. Nevertheless, he immediately began planning for a response after the Japanese attack, but none of his plans were carried forward when he was relieved. Roosevelt and King still had their eyes on Europe, even after the Pearl Harbor attack.

As i have written elsewhere in these fora, the Japanese attack on Hawaii deserves to be understood as one of the greatest military coups in naval history. They put together and executed one of the finest operations in the history of naval warfare. But Yamamoto, who was responsible for the attack, had no illusions. He simply wished to eliminate the American threat to the flank of the Imperial Navy's Southern Operation, and he had no illusions that the effect would only be temporary. His contemporaries did not understand this, and apparently, neither do you.

 
The Russians had no such armistice with Japan. The only way they knew that Japan wouldn't attack them was because they had a spy there who confirmed that. The release of the entire 350,000 Russian army from guarding against a possible Japanese invasion encircled the 300,000 german army at Stalingrad.
 

Once again, you have made a completely false statement, and apparently a statement from authority, an authority no better than that you have written it. Anyone who doubts that the Japanese and the Russians concluded an armistice in 1939 is free to look it up, in a library or online, whereupon they will discover the truth of my contention. The Germans arrived before Moscow in October, 1941. The battle for Stalingrad did not begin until September, 1942. The two events are unrelated, and took place more than a thousand miles apart. I'm sure Von Paulus would have liked to have had 300,000 troops in his Sixth Army, but at full strength (which the army was not), he would have barely had half that number. Did you make up the part about the saavy spy in Japan, or did you read that online somewhere? Perhaps in a novel?

 
The causes for Napoleon's and Hitler's attacks were two entire different scenarios. Napoleon only attacked Russia because he knew that its opposition would lead to revolt around the newly conquered continental Europe. He knew he had a good chance of losing, but he though that he would lose eventually if he didn't do it.
 

My remarks about the German attitude toward the capture and Napoleon's attitude toward the capture of that city are related simply on the basis of demonstrating the bad judgment of both men. They have nothing to do with the causes of either war. Napoleon certainly understood that Russia's challenge to his Continental System would have to be answered lest the entire house of cards come tumbling down. That is not, however, good reason to suggest that he invaded against his better judgment. He was a very complex man, and the reality of his writings and statements differs greatly from the mythology surrounding him. Nevertheless, both he and Hitler operated under the delusion that taking Moscow would end Russian resistance. Napoleon was bisabused of the notion by having taken Moscow, and having then lost his army. Hitler was never disabused of his delusions, and more frantically ranted about cowards and traitors as an army completely unprepared for a Russian winter hung on by the skin of it's collective teeth after just managing to reach, without taking, Leningrad and Moscow.
 
 
!!

Good post Setanta. You're in sparkling form.

I had a feeling something like that might be on its way.

I think I now have to revise my position on Hitler from someone who "allowed his judgement to be clouded by his fanaticism" to maybe as you say "idiot"  
 
 
Cheers, Boss... i'm putting too much strain on my peepers right now, but i'm enjoying myself.
 
 
Setanta
Glad to have you back if only occasionally. Your posts as usual are pearls of wisdom.
 
 
 
[
he thought he knew all about military operations from his extensive service as a messenger boy in the First War.

 

This is not a fact but wasnt Hitler taught by his generals about the conduct of war after him rising to power?
 
 
 
That war with the Soviet Union was inevitable should not be doubted: Hitler had already told in Mein Kampf of his plans to find "living space" for the German people in the Ukraine, and Stalin accepted it as a given that the Germans would invade. Recently released documents show that Stalin believe such an invasion would come in 1943, and was therefore caught unprepared, while he was fighting the Finns and the Japanese. (See Stalin: The Court of the Red Tsar, Simon Montefiore.)
 

What does this mean? That the invasion came when the Soviet Union was fighting the Finns and the Japanese? The Soviet Union didnt have a state of war existing with any country at the time of German invasion. The last mentionable engagements with Japan ended in the autumn of 1939 and the Winter War with the Finns ended in March of 1940. As we all know, the Germans invaded the Soviet Union in June of 1941. It might be true that Stalin was caught unprepared but it had nothing to do with the previous engagements with the Finns and the Japanese. Stalin knew when the invasion was going to take place but he didnt want to believe it, even few hours after the invasion had started. Thats why no actions were taken to prepare for the oncoming invasion.
 
 
 
This is not a fact but wasnt Hitler taught by his generals about the conduct of war after him rising to power?
 

No. But you might have sources for this?
 
 
That, and the fact that he had gutted the officer corps of the Red Army in the 1930's purges. Stalin certainly had enough to do without also replacing the function of a military staff. This statement of mine above, which you have quoted, without attribution, is a simplistic statement. Writing something like this in a single paragraph is an oversimplification, and avoids the necessity of a longer, more detailed explanation.

Whereas it is true that the Winter War was ended, significant Russian resources remained concentrated in Karelia, because even the surrender of territory which Finland had made in March, 1940, had not satisfied Stalin. Certainly the Finns were not satisfied--they declared war on the Soviet Union within a few days of the commencement of Operation Barbarossa. In the far east, your reference to "last mentionable engagements" with the Japanese is quite misleading. The Russo-Japanese non-aggression pact was not signed until April, 1941. The largest concentration of experienced, well-equipped Russian troops in the Soviet Union was in Irkutsk and the surrounding region. Even with the signing of a non-aggression pact, those resources were left in place. When war with Germany did come, it required months to get them back to the west. They barely arrived in time to stabilize the Soviet line, and even then Moscow was saved as much through German fumbling as it was the arrival of troops from the far east.

My point was that Stalin was caught flat-footed by the German invasion. His military resources had been strained by the Russo-Finnish war, and by the brush-fire skirmishes with Japan over several years. He had crippled his army with the purges of the high command. Having gotten his pound of flesh out of Poland, he left his western frontier woefully under-manned militarily. Even the German moves in the Balkans seem not to have alerted him to his potential danger. Having a competent, experienced general staff might well have saved a lot of Russian lives, because there then would have been people with genuine military expertise keeping an eye on the situation.

I guess i should not take short-cuts like this, but i so often get the feeling here of exhaustion, of not being up to the task of providing more specific detail--and of people not being willing to read long post, and my posts get quite long even when i don't provide a lot of specific detail.

In regard to your question in which you actually did quote me by name: Hitler had indeed served as a runner in the trenches. He had gone to Bavaria and joined a Bavarian regiment. Although those who admire him make him out to have been some kind of valiant soldier in the trenches, in fact, he was acting as a regimental runner (messenger) at the time he was gassed in the Ypres salient.

My remark was sarcastic. Hitler had reached the exalted rank of corporal. The suggestion that he learned anything from his officer corps is absurd, although i'm certain that you made the remark in good faith. Admiral Raeder hated the Nazis, and privately expressed contempt for Hitler, although he publicly supported Hitler because of his (Hitler's)desire to recreate German military might. Hitler understood very little of naval affairs, and was sceptical of the value of a navy. Goering squabbled constantly with Raeder for resources. Hitler wanted to use naval resources for commerce raiding, which ended by squandering Raeder's large surface assets, such as Bismark and Graf Spee. Tirpitz was bottled up in Norway for much of the war, and Scharnhorst was lost attempting to stop the arctic convoys to the Soviet Union in December, 1943. She had been operating with Lutzow, Tirpitz and Hipper, and when these ships failed to achieve what Hitler had wanted, Raeder was fired and replaced by Doenitz in January, 1943. Doenitz was a sycophant much on the order of Goering, and no major operations by the navy were conducted under his command after the loss of Scharnhorst in December of 1943.

Goering had become a German hero in the Great War, taking over von Richtoffen's flying group after he had been shot down. He was a clown; he dressed up in ridiculously ornate uniforms of the kind Kaiser Wilhelm had favored, and he spent a good deal of his time playing the great lord, entertaining guests at his hunting lodge, and appearing in public with well-known Germans and foreign visitors whenever possible. Although trained as a fighter pilot and possessing sufficient intelligence to have known better, he acquiesced in Hitler's obssession with bombing and bombers. He threw tantrums to always get as much of limited resources as possible, even to the ludicrous extent of being given his own panzer division, which was allegedly an "airborne" panzer division. The Herman Goering division got the best of everything, and they fought hard in Sicily and Italy, but the resources diverted to the Luftwaffe for huge numbers of ground troops might well have been used more effectively elsewhere. Student's airborne troops had suffered horrible casualties in the operation on Crete, but they had nevertheless accomplished their mission--but Hitler would never again allow the airborne troops to be used in that role. Goering, however, continued to expand the airborne troops, and got the first choice of equipment for troops who ended the war slogging it out on foot as infantry. That they were first-class infantry does not lessen the fact that this was just one more case in which the Wehrmacht went begging while Hitler's cronies squabbled over resources. Essentially the same thing happened with the SS.

Galland begged for more resources for the fighter arm of the Luftwaffe, until relations between him and Hitler became so acrimonious that Goering assured that Galland would not meet with Hitler again. Although certainly first-class aircraft, the Me109 and the FW190 were increasingly outmoded designs, and were replaced by no new designs during the war. The Me262 was available for a production model in the spring of 1943, but its deployment was delayed for a year and half as engineers at Messerschmidt attempted to make it into a bomber--but the turbine power plants simply did not have the power to lift the aircraft off the ground with a significant bomb load. After the war, before he took his own life, Goering was interrogated, and is reputed to have responded to the question of when he knew the war was lost by saying: "When I saw the first Mustangs over Berlin."

When Soviet tanks, especially the T-34, made a mess of the outdated Panzerkampfwagen on the eastern front, German officers pleaded for OKH to simply order a German model of the same vehicle. Instead, they were given the over-built Tiger and Panther series of tanks. Although certainly expressions of highest art of the manufacturer, they were slow and costly to build, required frequent expert maintenance, and large supplies of spare parts. The Germans built a few thousand of these tanks. On the eastern front they faced tens of thousands of T-34's, and on the western front, they faced tens of thousands of Sherman tanks. The increasing effectiveness of American daylight bombing assured that even those Tiger and Panther tanks which had been deployed could not adequately be maintained.

Hitler insisted repeatedly that positions must never be abandoned. He promoted von Paulus Field Marshall and then observed that no German Field Marshall had ever surrendered (he apparently did not consider the 1918 armistice to have been a form of surrender). Surrounded in Stalingrad, his Sixth Army reduced to a skeletal force, von Paulus surrendered. Rommel considered the commitment of more resources to Tunisia to be a waste, and is reputed to have said privately that Tunisia was the largest self-supporting prisoner of war camp in history. Wishing to believe that the main Allied landings in Europe would be in the Pas-de-Calais, the most heavily defended area in the world at the time, Hitler was easily duped by the circus antics of Patton's non-existent army in Britain, which at that point was a collection of jeeps and radio operators (before you jump me for this, i know he was later given a real army). The Fifteenth Army stayed in postion in the Pas de Calais while the Seventh Army was ground to dust in Normandy. The Fifteenth Army did not leave its coastal fortifications until Horrock's XXX Corps was poised to invade Holland.

I know that you asked your question in seriousness, and i mean you no insult, but the contention that Hitler was taught anything by anybody made me laugh out loud. He never considered that he need to learn anything, and never showed any interest in being taught.
 
 
 
In the far east, your reference to "last mentionable engagements" with the Japanese is quite misleading. The Russo-Japanese non-aggression pact was not signed until April, 1941. The largest concentration of experienced, well-equipped Russian troops in the Soviet Union was in Irkutsk and the surrounding region. Even with the signing of a non-aggression pact, those resources were left in place. When war with Germany did come, it required months to get them back to the west. They barely arrived in time to stabilize the Soviet line, and even then Moscow was saved as much through German fumbling as it was the arrival of troops from the far east.

Although trained as a fighter pilot and possessing sufficient intelligence to have known better, he(Goering) acquiesced in Hitler's obssession with bombing and bombers.

My remark was sarcastic. Hitler had reached the exalted rank of corporal. The suggestion that he learned anything from his officer corps is absurd, although i'm certain that you made the remark in good faith. Admiral Raeder hated the Nazis, and privately expressed contempt for Hitler, although he publicly supported Hitler because of his (Hitler's)desire to recreate German military might.

Quote:
The Russians had no such armistice with Japan. The only way they knew that Japan wouldn't attack them was because they had a spy there who confirmed that. The release of the entire 350,000 Russian army from guarding against a possible Japanese invasion encircled the 300,000 german army at Stalingrad.

Once again, you have made a completely false statement, and apparently a statement from authority, an authority no better than that you have written it. Anyone who doubts that the Japanese and the Russians concluded an armistice in 1939 is free to look it up, in a library or online, whereupon they will discover the truth of my contention. The Germans arrived before Moscow in October, 1941. The battle for Stalingrad did not begin until September, 1942. The two events are unrelated, and took place more than a thousand miles apart. I'm sure Von Paulus would have liked to have had 300,000 troops in his Sixth Army, but at full strength (which the army was not), he would have barely had half that number. Did you make up the part about the saavy spy in Japan, or did you read that online somewhere? Perhaps in a novel?

 

I respect your educated answers.

There might have been some skirmishes around Manchukuon and Mongolian borders even after 1940 but Im referring to the Khalkhin Gol battle between the Soviet Union and Japan between May 14 and September 16 of 1939 when a cease-fire agreement was signed. After that the Japanese were afraid of embarking on any more major battles with the Soviet Union as I said.

When Adolf Hitler invaded the Soviet Union in the summer of 1941, the Japanese were tempted to join the assault, but the shadow of Khalkhin Gol haunted them. With the influence of the Strike North group at an end, Japanese military planners began to look at British, French and Dutch colonial possessions in Southeast Asia as offering greater prospects for expansion.

Stalin remembered the fierce fighting in Mongolia as well. Even as he summoned 1,000 tanks and 1,200 warplanes from Soviet Far Eastern forces to battle the German invaders who were making spectacular gains, 19 reserve divisions, 1,200 tanks and some 1,000 aircraft remained in Mongolia to confront the Japanese. Although small by the standards of later World War II battles, the fighting between Soviet and Japanese forces at Khalkhin Gol cast a long shadow over subsequent events in the Pacific theater and on the Russian Front.

You are wrong about Goering acquiescing in Hitlers obsession with bombers. Goering himself was a supporter of Douhets theories about strategic bombing.

You are right about Raeder. Although he wasnt so keen on Hitler, he was the key element in Hitler getting the power. When Hindenburg was dying, Hitler asked whether wehrmacht and kriegsmarine would support his intentions about combining the chanchellors and the presidents offices. Knowing that Hindenburgs wish was that the Hohenzollers would get the power back and that the kriegsmarine and the wehrmacht were supporting Hindenburg, Hitler promised them to revive the German war machine to a bigger extent than never before. Raeder and everyone else supported Hitler. As it was, Hitler kept his promise and secured the power after a difficult situation.

In the Stalingrad encirclement there were nearly 300 000 Romanian and German soldiers. That fact was found in a Finnish book by a rtd colonel. Its called "Ilmatorjunta Ilmasodassa 1794-1945" by Ahti Lappi if you want to look it up.
 
 
The Roumanian troops were on the flank of the Sixth Army, they were not with von Paulus in Stalingrad. The Russian 64th Army Group, which had reeled back before the Germans, managed to hold against the Roumanians. When, on about November 14th, the Volga froze sufficiently to allow the movement of vehicles on the ice, the Red Army punched through the Roumanian line in a matter of days. The Sixth Army was not surrounded in Stalingrad until the Roumanian line had collapsed. Although once again, i am certain you report this in good faith, you either have gotten incomplete information, or you have not applied perspective to the situation. With Sixth Army cut off, and the Roumanians shattered, the Germans moved quickly to stabilize the line. The Roumanians who were rounded up by the Soviets were the shattered remnants of that army, they were not in Stalingrad, and by the time they were rounded up in droves, the Germans had stabilized a line behind their former position, and the Soviets were unable to drive any further west.

I also think your remarks about Goering are rather naive. Goering was like so many people in history who have occupied visible positions in society, he was sycophantic. He held the opinion currently which corresponded to that of the last important person he had spoken to. I have not the least doubt that he talked up Doheny's theory when in the presence of Hitler. When in the presence of Adolf Galland, he bemoaned with him the "step-child" treatment given the fighter arm. I have simply said that Goering ought to have known better, and likely did know better--but he was a toady, and it was a particular skill of his that he could quickly ascertain just what he needed to say to get in or stay in the good graces of those around him. It would likely be no too difficult at all to find instances of Goering's opinion on air power resources boxing the compass from one extreme to any other.

Your comments about the Japanese and their decision on the southern plan are not well-informed. The Southern Operation was in the planning stage by 1940. Yamamoto became the Commander, Combined Imperial Fleet in late 1939. At some point in early 1940, he conceived his plan to attack Pearl Harbor. No such plan would have been necessary, were it not anticipated that Japanese operations would elicit a bellicose response by the United States. The mineral and petroleum resources known to be available in the Soviet far east at that time were miniscule in comparison to the known mineral and petroleum resources of Borneo, Malaya and the Netherlands East Indies. The Japanese and Soviets signed an armistice in 1939. They did not sign a non-agression pact until 1941. By then, planning for both the Pearl Harbor attack and the Southern Operation were well along. From the very beginning, Yamamoto had to deal with opposition to his Pearl Harbor plan because the First Bureau of the Imperial Navy were already devoted to the implementation of the Southern Operation.
 
 
 
The Roumanian troops were on the flank of the Sixth Army, they were not with von Paulus in Stalingrad. The Russian 64th Army Group, which had reeled back before the Germans, managed to hold against the Roumanians. When, on about November 14th, the Volga froze sufficiently to allow the movement of vehicles on the ice, the Red Army punched through the Roumanian line in a matter of days. The Sixth Army was not surrounded in Stalingrad until the Roumanian line had collapsed. Although once again, i am certain you report this in good faith, you either have gotten incomplete information, or you have not applied perspective to the situation. With Sixth Army cut off, and the Roumanians shattered, the Germans moved quickly to stabilize the line. The Roumanians who were rounded up by the Soviets were the shattered remnants of that army, they were not in Stalingrad, and by the time they were rounded up in droves, the Germans had stabilized a line behind their former position, and the Soviets were unable to drive any further west.

I also think your remarks about Goering are rather naive. Goering was like so many people in history who have occupied visible positions in society, he was sycophantic. He held the opinion currently which corresponded to that of the last important person he had spoken to. I have not the least doubt that he talked up Doheny's theory when in the presence of Hitler. When in the presence of Adolf Galland, he bemoaned with him the "step-child" treatment given the fighter arm. I have simply said that Goering ought to have known better, and likely did know better--but he was a toady, and it was a particular skill of his that he could quickly ascertain just what he needed to say to get in or stay in the good graces of those around him. It would likely be no too difficult at all to find instances of Goering's opinion on air power resources boxing the compass from one extreme to any other.

Your comments about the Japanese and their decision on the southern plan are not well-informed. The Southern Operation was in the planning stage by 1940. Yamamoto became the Commander, Combined Imperial Fleet in late 1939. At some point in early 1940, he conceived his plan to attack Pearl Harbor. No such plan would have been necessary, were it not anticipated that Japanese operations would elicit a bellicose response by the United States. The mineral and petroleum resources known to be available in the Soviet far east at that time were miniscule in comparison to the known mineral and petroleum resources of Borneo, Malaya and the Netherlands East Indies. The Japanese and Soviets signed an armistice in 1939. They did not sign a non-agression pact until 1941. By then, planning for both the Pearl Harbor attack and the Southern Operation were well along. From the very beginning, Yamamoto had to deal with opposition to his Pearl Harbor plan because the First Bureau of the Imperial Navy were already devoted to the implementation of the Southern Operation.
 

I suppose you were there at Stalingrad? I am not saying that I am right but perhaps neither should you. Information doesnt just pop up in your head. We learn from what we read. I learned that fact by reading a strictly historical and factual book. If that contains false information then I am sorry. Although I believe that most of what you say is based on some books also. From what I read, encircled in Stalingrad were the whole German 6. army, parts of the German 4. panzer army and the Romanian 4. army. Also in Stalingrad were some 12 000 Luftwaffe soldiers along with the 9. AA division.

I believe that what you say about Goering is true but I meant that initially, when Goering and others started building the Luftwaffe at the first place, he supported Douhets, not Dohenys as you wrote, doctorine of building an armada of stratetic bombers and striking against the enemys peoples morale and industry with them. The main body of the Luftwaffe was largely based on these views. And from what I gather, Goering had a mind of his own and didnt like Hitler so much that he would have flattered him so much as it was seen in the last days of the Third Reich. Also as Douhet believed that wars could be won with simply overwhelming air power regardless of land or sea power, can similar believes be found in Goerings boasting. And in fact, Hitler himself was a supporter of blitzkrieg. He believed it would be faster to accomplish his goals rather than a long-term strategic bombing campain. That is why Hitler wanted Luftwaffe to have a tactical mission, not strategic as Goering insisted.

When I at the first place said that there were no mentionable engagements between the Soviet Union and Japan, I merely meant that Soviet Unions hand werent tied by Japan or that Japan didnt somehow effect Soviet Unions war effort against Germany as you suggested. Although the 19 reserve divisions, 1,200 tanks and some 1,000 aircraft left in Mongolia might have done something in the western front.
 
 
Yes, you are absolutely correct to point out that I have written Douhet's incorrectly. I do that often, and should make a better effort to get that correct. I think perhaps what we have at issue here is a definition of Stalingrad. From the several sources i have read, you are correct to place the Sixth Army there, supported by the 4th Panzer, as well as by some self-propelled gun units ("Stugs") and mechanized combat engineer (pioneer) units. I further have read of the FLAK units, which were intended to have been placed on Mamayev Kurgan, but the possession of that commanding height changed to often for either side to have put even a semi-permanent gun emplacement there. However, what i have read is that the Roumanians were north of the Krazny Octyaber factory, and the northern suburbs of the city. I have read that von Paulus pushed his army into the city and to the banks of the river, but that the Roumanians were unable to push that far. So we may in fact be saying the same thing, but you are referring to the entire salient created by Sixth Army and the Roumanians, while i am referring soley to the city, as the map below illustrates:

 

On either flank of the Germans were the Roumanians, as the map below illustrates:

 

So i suspect that we have read the same information, but that i refer soley to the 6th Army occupying the city of Stalingrad, and you are referring to the entire salient, which would have included the Roumanians.
 
 
As for Goering, i would suggest to you once again that his talent for telling people what they wanted to hear is the most likely reason for him to have supported a strategic bombing policy. This we can never know, and i do not for a moment deny that Georing publicly supported bomber programs--i just suspect, especially in light of his conversations privately with the officers of his fighter division, that either he was simply telling Hitler what he wanted to hear, or telling those officers what they wanted to hear--or both.
 
 
 
As for Goering, i would suggest to you once again that his talent for telling people what they wanted to hear is the most likely reason for him to have supported a strategic bombing policy. This we can never know, and i do not for a moment deny that Georing publicly supported bomber programs--i just suspect, especially in light of his conversations privately with the officers of his fighter division, that either he was simply telling Hitler what he wanted to hear, or telling those officers what they wanted to hear--or both.
 

Now I agree with you about Stalingrad. Pure misunderstanding. But as I said in my previous post, I have gotten the picture from some of the factual books that I have read that Hitler didnt desire strategic squadrons whereas I have read that Goering was somewhat possessed with them. Hitler wanted the Luftwaffe to mostly just support his Wehrmacht so he wanted tactical and close air support planes such as JU-87 to help his blitzkrieg doctorine. But as you said, we can never know. Goering and Hitler were the only ones to know for sure.
 
 
If your thesis about Hitler is true, then he was even more militarily clueless than i have suggested. The Junkers aircraft were extremely vulnerable. The only way for them to have been reliably effective would have been to have provided them fighter cover--they couldn't handle modern fighter aircraft by 1939. I guess i'll have to revised my standard statement simply to note that he disparaged and refused to support the fighter arm of the Luftwaffe, against all reason.
 
 
 
If your thesis about Hitler is true, then he was even more militarily clueless than i have suggested. The Junkers aircraft were extremely vulnerable. The only way for them to have been reliably effective would have been to have provided them fighter cover--they couldn't handle modern fighter aircraft by 1939. I guess i'll have to revised my standard statement simply to note that he disparaged and refused to support the fighter arm of the Luftwaffe, against all reason.
 

Yes. Being a dive bomber JU-87 was an easy target for anti-aircraft fire. They were, however, extremly accurate when attacking, for instance, tanks. Fliegergruppe Kuhlmey played an important part in defending the Isthmus in Finland against Soviet Unions summeroffensive in 1944 destroying high numbers of Soviet tanks.
 
 
They were vulnerable to fighters, in particular. Kesselring tried to use the Junkers to take out the radar installations in England at the start of "the battle of Britain," but the RAF dispatched them in short order. German losses were very heavy, and the English had their radar stations up and running within days.
 
 
 
This smacks a great deal of "Battle of Britain" heroic mythololgy. The Royal Navy was a rather significant something "disallowing" an invasion of England. The use of air power, however, might have covered both airborne and seaborne landings--Adolf Galland proved this when as Luftwaffe fighter commander, he managed the protection of Scharnhorst, Gniesenau and Prinz Eugen as they ran the Channel in broad daylight. Who was bombing whom and for what reasons were militarily irrelevant to the fact that absolutely no contingency planning had been finalized for covering an invasion. As Kurt Student's falschirmjaeger proved on Crete, German airborne troops were prepared to make huge sacrifices to take and hold an airhead--but doing so would have required Hitler and Jodl to actually have thoroughly contemplated the ramifications of a possible invasion. To cover the invasion boats from the air required fighters, not bombers, and Hitler was obsessed with bombers and contemptuous of fighter aircraft. He was a devoted and rather clueless follower of Doheny's fantasies about crushing an opponent from the air, breaking the will of the people to fight. Both the heroic couple in Buckingham Palace, and the tough Eastenders of London demonstrated that in fact the opposite is likely to occur, hardening the resolve of the defenders. Hitler ought to have learned this lesson from the bombing of Warsaw, but the fool wasn't out to learn, he thought he knew all about military operations from his extensive service as a messenger boy in the First War.

Galland describes the operation to run the German battlecruisers through the Channel under fighter cover in his war memoir, The First and the Last. For an invasion of England to have worked, the German Navy would have had to go in harm's way with a will. German destroyers proved they were willing to make such a sacrifice in the operaitons off Narvik in 1940. Bismark dispatched Hood so quickly, that it is a reasonable proposition to suggest that the German Navy could have fought the Royal Navy to a standstill, which was all that would have been required.

The RAF were never on the ropes in the manner the Battle of Britain mythology would have us believe. Fighter squadrons in the Midlands, the North, Scotland and Northern Ireland were intact and ready for service. In the Home Counties and Kent and Sussex, the aircraft factories of Hawker and Supermarine were already moving equipment and relocating operations when the Battle of Britain began, assuring the continued manufacture of Hurricanes and Spitfires. The RAF did not even risk that much of its personnel in the campaign--about forty percent of their pilots were Polish (and 40% of aircrew casualties were Polish, as well), and another ten percent were Belgian, French, Dutch and Norwegian, along with Dominion volunteers (Canada, Australia, New Zealand and South Africa). It helps the heroic image to suggest that the RAF were near destruction in September, 1940, but it is not a true picture. Neither the nightly area bombing by the Germans, nor the same by the English over German cities, were significantly effective in destroying either the means or the will of their respective enemies to prosecute the war.
 

Actually if Hitler hadn't switched to bombing cities in retaliation to a bombing of a German city, he would have annihilated the RAF, thus he could have conquered Britain much easier. A plan would have been designed to invade England very fast as the most fortified Fort in the world at Holland was captured by paratroopers in less than a day. I don't know how you believe fighters will do that, but I can certainly see bombers blowing up air bases with bombs. Yes, destroying air bases reduces the air force as one might expect, and if Hitler had only done that he would have been successful. But he wasn't a very patient man, now was he. If Hitler had conquered Britain then the only possible landing stage for the US would have been Iceland, which is very far away, so the war would have took a very different turn.

 
Your first contention is complete chimera. That the English and French military establishments were starved is not to be wondered at, both nations had been obliged to release as many men as possible in 1919, to assuage public opinion. In both nations, politicians pandered to public sentiment with talk of disarming from 1918 onward. A great many people in Europe longed for such a circumstance from the end of the First War. The Germans differed because they had bought--hook, line and sinker--the Ludendorf betrayal myth, which contended that the German Army had not been defeated in the field, but had been sold out by politicians and bureaucrats.
 

That's not true. Germany knew that it was surrounded by enemies, so they knew that if they were to win the war they would have to win it fast. This attempt happened twice, at the Battle of Marne in both 1914 and 1918. Germany was a few miles away from Paris and had it gotten there, they would have won the war. But I don't know why you're bringing this up, it's WWI.

 
Part of Hilter's appeal, and a core necessity of his bellicose rhetoric was to be seen as a militarist. When the Allies were obliged to send so many men home in 1919, they unwisely relied upon the Freikorps to "keep the peace" in the Baltic region, and this only convinced the German people all the more that their Army had been invincible, but had been sold out. Hitler rolled into the Rhineland on the heels of the departing French as though he had driven them out; then he effected the aunchluss with Austria, and promised to create a Greater Germany. He was politically committed to this program--neither sound military policy nor intricate strategems ever played a part in his thinking.
 

The German People knew their armies weren't invincible, and the only reason Hitler put troops back in the Rhineland was to intimidate Britain and France, because he wanted them to attack.

 
Which leads us to your second point. The "Sudeten" Germans had never been part of Germany, and had always been residents of Bohemia. There had been some noise about uniting them with Germany in Paris in 1919, but it was quickly brushed aside, and the German-speaking population of Czechoslovakia quickly came to appreciate living in a relative prosperous and stable country as they looked at the chaos of Germany in the 1920's. The very term "Sudentenland" is a politically manufactured term which only came into being at the end of the First War.

 

Again this was Hitler's attempt to throw Europe at war again, something which neither Britain nor France wanted to do after the destruction of WWI.

 
That Stalin considered war with Germany inevitable is not to be doubted. That he had "been preparing" for such a war is hardly supported by the evidence, however. He was in 1939 fighting both the Finns and the Japanese, and the Red Army was in a shambles at the command level due to the purges. I am quite well aware of the origins of Josef Dugashvilli.
 

Unfortunately for that theory, Stalin was preparing even before the Non-Aggression Pact was signed, even though to no avail. It would not make any sense for someone who is expected to invade you for you not to prepare. That's like saying you're exposing yourself with the knowledge that you will be struck.

 
Your remarks suggest that the American Navy was destroyed at Pearl Harbor and had to be rebuilt. Given that we are discussing Hitler, who had no clue about naval operations, and did his best to avoid the subject, your remark is rather a non sequitur. It is also as naive as the contention the the RAF faced destruction in the Battle of Britain. The great tragedy of Pearl Harbor was the loss of life. The old battleships which were attacked were quickly replaced because they were 20 to 30 years old, and new construction had already begun to replace them. The Japanese missed the American carriers altogether, and that was their eventual downfall. In fact, so much naval shipping had been diverted to the Atlantic by December, 1941, that Kimmel was constantly complaining to King that his best assets were being taken from him, and that he was increasingly unprepared to face the Japanese. Nevertheless, he immediately began planning for a response after the Japanese attack, but none of his plans were carried forward when he was relieved. Roosevelt and King still had their eyes on Europe, even after the Pearl Harbor attack.
 

Thank you for the history lesson.

 
As i have written elsewhere in these fora, the Japanese attack on Hawaii deserves to be understood as one of the greatest military coups in naval history. They put together and executed one of the finest operations in the history of naval warfare. But Yamamoto, who was responsible for the attack, had no illusions. He simply wished to eliminate the American threat to the flank of the Imperial Navy's Southern Operation, and he had no illusions that the effect would only be temporary. His contemporaries did not understand this, and apparently, neither do you.
 

If you had actually read some history instead of looking up facts, you would know that whenever a Japan attacks a country it sneaks attacks it as it did in the Russo-Japanese war when it was becoming an Imperialistic nation. Apparently you do not understand this so you make up statements like Japan was just messing around with the US at Pearl Harbor.

 
Once again, you have made a completely false statement, and apparently a statement from authority, an authority no better than that you have written it. Anyone who doubts that the Japanese and the Russians concluded an armistice in 1939 is free to look it up, in a library or online, whereupon they will discover the truth of my contention. The Germans arrived before Moscow in October, 1941. The battle for Stalingrad did not begin until September, 1942. The two events are unrelated, and took place more than a thousand miles apart. I'm sure Von Paulus would have liked to have had 300,000 troops in his Sixth Army, but at full strength (which the army was not), he would have barely had half that number. Did you make up the part about the saavy spy in Japan, or did you read that online somewhere? Perhaps in a novel?
 

Hmm an armistice doesn't pop anywhere, perhaps you should enlighten me on some of the sources you copy paste your info from so maybe I can see what bs you read. In fact the spy's name is Richard Sorge (1895-1944) And you're free to look him up in the Internet. He was a German journalist who spied for Russia. While working for a newspaper in Japan, he learned that Japan planned to attack Asia in 1941, rather than Russia. This was vital information to Russia, leaving her troops free to fight Germany.
Maybe you should actually read what happened instead of saying Russia had armistices with Japan in WWII. Japan had been disappointed by not being able to attack Russia simultaneously, thus it turned its attention at Asia in 1941 as reported by a spy. I don't know which novel you read but by 1943 Japan was occupied with the US. In fact you should stop copy+pasting facts from the net and actually focus on what's being discussed, because if you haven't noticed no one actually responds to what you have to say as most of the time it's being disconnect with the subject. If you actually read some history from a book, you would know that the German 6th army, supposedly the best was in fact at about 600,000, half of which were captured and the other dead. If you actually bothered to review what you read you might find out that that army was encircled by Russian troops.
 
 
Sure, Bubba, whatever you say...
 
 
torro the little figure by the word posts refers to the number of posts from each participant

by Setanta is, at the time of writing, 21604

your figure stands at 1

I normally welcome new members and look forward to further input, but in your case 1 is sufficient.
 
 
 
Actually if Hitler hadn't switched to bombing cities in retaliation to a bombing of a German city, he would have annihilated the RAF, thus he could have conquered Britain much easier. A plan would have been designed to invade England very fast as the most fortified Fort in the world at Holland was captured by paratroopers in less than a day. I don't know how you believe fighters will do that, but I can certainly see bombers blowing up air bases with bombs. Yes, destroying air bases reduces the air force as one might expect, and if Hitler had only done that he would have been successful. But he wasn't a very patient man, now was he. If Hitler had conquered Britain then the only possible landing stage for the US would have been Iceland, which is very far away, so the war would have took a very different turn.
 

I have read one or two works on this subject, being half-Dutch and having spent half my life in Holland and I contest your statement. Holand was hardly the most heavily fortified fortress in the world, and most of the forts that did exist were obsolete already in WWI. The strength of the fortress Holland was in its water defences (It was called "the water line") and its weak points were the bridges that would make entry into Holland easy for ground troops.

The success of the paratroopers and airborne infantry in breaching the water line lay in the element of surprise which allowed them to capture three key bridges. The Dutch forces were unable to dislodge them in time before the first German tanks rolled into Holland (which took four days, not one).
The rest of the airborne operation in Holland, which featured the capture of three airfields around the Hague and subsequently the arrest of the Queen and the government of the Netherlands, was a dismal failure. None of the airfields was successfully taken and the airborne troops suffered heavy losses in men and material (3000 of them were shipped as POWs to England just before the Dutch capitulated). The key losses were those of transport aircraft that had been downed literally in the hundreds by the Dutch airforce and by AA fire, a loss that could not be replaced in time for an airborne assault on England in the summer of 1940.

In other words paratroopers never captured the fortress Holand, they only opened the door. Their attempt at knocking out the Dutch leadership failed entirely.

Considering thus that the main ground attack performed by the airborne troops was a failure and that there were no bridges across the English Channel for them to take by surprise, nor enough transport aircraft to ferry them across, their ability to capture and hold a brigdehead on the British coast long enough for their ground forces to arrive, was highly doubtful.

Finally, the bombing of airbases is only effective when you can destroy enemy aircraft on the ground (as happened during the surprise attack on Holland). If the enemy is prepared (and can se you coming with radar) the chance of that succeeding is very slim. Trying to destroy the airfields themselves is a pointless waste of resources, because they can be quite easily and quickly repaired (especially the grass fields in the UK). As an example you could look up the airbase of Valetta on Malta that continued to operate under one of the heaviest German bombing campaigns of the war.

(Or were you perhaps mistaken with the modern fortress of Eben Emael in Belgium?)
 
 
WWII
It's interesting to know what the alliances had been leading up to WWII.

1. Germany, France, and England against the Soviet Union.
2. Germany against France, England and the Soviet Union.
3. Germany and the Soviet Union against France and
England.

Add to this, the belief of the English military, that Poland would put up a strong fight against any move by Germany. Their reasoning? The Polish Army had a considerable percentage of aristocrats who would provide the leadership needed to do the job.

Add, the belief of Hitler (Mein Kampf) that Slavs were sub-human
and were a drag on the world. Slavs should only be taught to read traffic signs so as not to be killed by vehicles. That way they could better fulfill their role as beasts of burden.
When Hitler invaded Russia, the German Army had a scorched earth policy: kill everyone in the villages and towns.

At one point, the Germans were faced with what to do with a thousand Russian prisoners. They put them in a field, surrounded them with barbed wire, and no food, no water, no shelter. Just a couple guards should anyone try to escape.

These practices lead a German general (Kolbe ?) to question the practice. He said it was insuring that the Russians would fight to the last person.

My point is that all the discussion about generals and Hitler's judgments are good. But I also think that the will of the people i.e. the Germans in the early thirties, watching god (Hitler) descend from a tri-plane in the documentary "Triumph of the Will" provided the where with all.

And, add the fact that of the six million Jews killed, most were killed in a frenzy of killing during the last year of the war. The killings were stepped up at at a time when Germany was depleated of trains, manpower, fuel, supplies.
This must have played into how the war was conducted by Germany.
 
 
The Kursk
Up to 1943 Hitler had a very good chance of winning the war. After the disasterous defeat at Stalingrad, the German Army wasn't defeated nor beaten soundly. It may have lost the entire Southern Russian Plains, even Kharkov BUT under the 'miracle' of General von Manstein it had counterattacked and recaptured Kharkov and stablised it's fronts on the Don.

The greatest blunder besides Stalingrad on Hitler's part has to be the calling off the Kursk offensive after the Battle of Prokhorvka, the greatest tank battle ever fought. The myth here is that the Russians destroyed the vast majority of the German S.S. Panzers and ended their offensive. So much so that Hitler called off the offensive.

Nearly every book and article will praise the brave Soviet Armour finally beating the Panzers. The Germans according to Soviet estimates had 700 tanks and the Russians about 1000. The T-34's heroically charged the field and destroyed over 400 of them and even many of the formidable Tiger tanks. The losses were so great that Hitler called off the offensive.

BUT German documents show that on the day of the battle, the 12th of July 1943, they only had 327+ operational tanks and 15 Tiger Tanks in service. After the battle the Germans recorded about 70 tanks destroyed and many damaged. 200 that were battle worthy including every one of the Tiger tanks. The Soviets two attacking tank armies were all but destroyed and had the German's pushed on, they would have pushed the Russian's back and taken Prokhorovka. From there, open road lay before them until Kursk and the possiblity of the encirclement of 5 entire Soviet Armies. The annihilation of these armies would have futher stablised the German Front and prolonged the war by many monthes if Stalin hadn't sued for peace by then.

Lastly, Hitler never utalised the manpower of the Russian prisoners. It was clear that many Russians, Ukranians and Belorussians were not very happy over the communism that they lived under. Many Russians defected at the very start of the invasion to attempt to help the Germans 'liberate' their country. There was an Army under the leadership of a Russian General who I'm sorry to report I've forgotten his name, but whom lobbied within Nazi circles to let him create and army from Russian P.O.W.s. Arm them with German weapons and let them fight their old comrades. This would have been a very staggering amount of manpower considering the vast amount of P.O.W.s Germany took in Russia.

And finally in reply to torro

 
The German People knew their armies weren't invincible, and the only reason Hitler put troops back in the Rhineland was to intimidate Britain and France, because he wanted them to attack.
 

Not at all. The German soldiers were told to retreat in case of an attack and the German army under the treaty of Versialles was only 100,000 strong at the point. Combained with no theatening Air Force at the time and the fairly strong French Army, Hitler would have lost if Chamberlin and the French leadership essentially had more BALLS.
 
 
Welcome to A2K Milf.

Your post begs the question why the Germans did not push on at Kursk. Are you saying Hitler missed a great opportunity?

I agree Chamberlain and Deladier? should have stood up to Hitler earlier, but its all with hindsight. Who in 1935/6 was saying war with Germany was inevitable and therefore the French and British should attack at a time of their choosing? And who can argue with the fact that the "peace" that appeasement of Hitler bought, at least enabled British industry to gear up for war when it finally came?
 
 
Realistically Britain and France missed many oppertunies to deal with Hitler. Even up to the Invasion of Poland and later, they could have crushed Hitler before he became a threat. Well, a French invasion during the Invasion of Poland would have let France cut Germany off from the Rhur Industries and that she was more than capable of. On paper the French Army was stronger. But French Morale was very low, and Maginot Feeling took over the country.

I believe the Kursk, not Stalingrad was the main turning point of the war. It was here that the Soviets later broke through and forced the Germans into a retreat which never really ended until the Oder. 200,000 Germans at least perished in this rout!!
 
 
"Realistically Britain and France missed many oppertunies to deal with Hitler. Even up to the Invasion of Poland and later, they could have crushed Hitler before he became a threat. "

such as?
 
 
Re: If Hitler had been smart, would Germany have won?

 
I'm hoping some of the students of history here can answer this. I certainly don't know much about the subject myself, but on war documentaries I've seen, there seemed to be what appeared even to me to be glaring blunders. Like almost having Moscow in sight, and then making a right turn (can't remember where he turned to). Did it give the Russians time to dig in? I'm sure there are other instances.
 

>If Hitler had been smart, would Germany have won?

Very short and simple answer to that one: Yes.

There were several very simple things Hitler could have done differently, any one of which would have changed the outcome of the war.

The simplest would have been simply not to invade Russia. The commie state would have collapsed of its own inertia within five years starting from 1940 and he could have simply picked up the pieces.

Or he could have entered the Ukraine as a liberator instead of as a lunatic bent on slaughtering the local populace. The CCCP could not have survived having the Ukraine torn off from it.

The next possibility would have been to enter the war with the 300 ocean-going Uboats which Doenitz wanted instead of trying to build battleships and take on the AngloSaxon powers in surface battles (no future in that). That would have taken England out of the war in less than a year.

Or he could have entered the war with a combination of U boats and small aircraft carriers like our own Lexington class. That would have meant carriers which allied capital ships could not reach because they'd have been behind a ring of U boats, and U boats which destroyers could not go after because they'd have been protected by messerschmidts and Focke Wolfes. England would have been out of the war in six months.

Or he could have handled the jet Messerschmidt project properly. That would have meant that allied bombers would never have been able to fly over Europe at all.

Or he could have made the Spanish an offer they couldn't refuse and taken Gibralter early on and totally denied the Med to allied ships.
 
 
if if if whats the point? He didnt.

I blame the Vienna Acadamy of Fine Arts.

If they had accepted him he might have put his energies into producing not particularly good paintings and no one would have ever heard of him.
 
 
If France invaded Germany during each of the crises, Germany would have been defeated. The reasons why Hitler became so powerful was the lack of Balls on the British and French sides.

Yes had Hitler used the man power of the Ukranians, if he entered as a liberator, then he would have had millions of more men to fight Stalin.
 
 
And if de Valera had accepted Churchill's offer of sovereignty over N Ireland in exchange for use of the naval base at Queenstown, we would have been spared the anguish that is still on going to this day.

But then de Valera thought Hitler was going to win,
 
 
Jesus man I'm Irish and that may have caused more grief than good. De Valera was entirely pro-British. He kept the Treaty Ports out of British hands to keep us neutral. He was very lax to British Servicemen that washed up on our shores and returned them to the British. Germans that washed up here were interned till the end of the war or were handed over to the British.
 
 
Milf

If De Valera was "entirely pro British" what was he doing leading an insurrection against British rule in Ireland? Even if he was entirely pro British it was only his American citizenship that saved him from a British firing squad. Why if he was so pro British did he deny Britain the use of important naval bases to help in the desperate battle against German submarines?

The Irish government a the time maintained a policy of strict neutrality, keeping their fingers crossed that Hitler would win.
 
 
 
If De Valera was "entirely pro British" what was he doing leading an insurrection against British rule in Ireland? Even if he was entirely pro British it was only his American citizenship that saved him from a British firing squad.
 

Hell no... Yes de Valera did take part as one of the leaders of the 1916 Easter Rising. And he did escape a firing squad because of his American citizenship. Of course as any revolutionries they looked to Germany whom Britain was at war with at the time for arms and support. Unfortunately or Fortunately from way what you look at it, the Auld, an German arms ship was intercepted of the shore of Cork and was scuttled by it's captain orders to prevent the arms entering British hands. Despite the failure to secure more arms the rising began anyway and failed.
After the war, the War of Independence began led by an unoffical government with de Valera as President. This war was waged for a year until there was a truce and a treaty was struck. De Valera didn't agree to the treaty but since the Irish people did in a referendum, he and a minority of the IRA started a civil war. This war was rather stupid and resulted in a waste of human life and destroyed the already shitty infanstructure of this island. Damage was done by the Republicans that took decades to recover from. Anyways the Pro-Treaty side won under the leadership of Michael Collins, who died in an ambush, and British Weapons. De Valera was in jail for a short period and didn't engage in politics due to the king's oath which had to be taken before every meeting of the Dail.
After many years, he founded Fianna Fail and even pledged the king's oath to enter parliment. His party gained power democratically and slowly unravelled the Treaty. He scrapped the king's oath, and the office of the

Governor General in a new constitution in 1937. As a clause in the Treaty, the British were allowed keep three major ports in Ireland as naval bases. De Valera knew that neutrality would be impossible if the ports were in British hands. So he lobbied for there return and got them before the war broke out.

I'm not a fan of de Valera myself, I personally think he was a fool who refused to give up power for years but his wise point was to keep us neutral. He was Prime Minister for about 20 years and President for 14.

 
Why if he was so pro British did he deny Britain the use of important naval bases to help in the desperate battle against German submarines?
 

British Naval Bases = German Bombers + Submarnes.. and what lies around these bases. Irish Territory, Shipping and lives. Our army was horribly underequipped and undertrained to deal with even a small German contingent. For example our navy at the time were three, yes only three speed boats!! Now fighting speed boats would have been difficult.

 
The Irish government a the time maintained a policy of strict neutrality, keeping their fingers crossed that Hitler would win.
 

The vast majority of the Irish People wanted the British to win. You may believe that the Irish people are fundementally anti-British but they were not. Many Irish men left to fight in the armies of the Empire. Including three of my great uncles, one who fought in both world wars. British planes were given free passage over our air space. British Shipping could seek refuge in our harbours.

Dublin was bombed and when Belfast was bombed the ENTIRE Dublin Fire Brigade was sent north to quench the flames. This doesn't sound like the actions of an anti-British country. But I do admit, de Valera did sign the book of Condolences for Hitler which did confirm our neutrality.

Well I for one believe had Hitler come here, a small contingent could install any puppet he ever wanted.....

Well here are the treaty ports...
Berehaven, Queenstown (renamed Cobh) and Lough Swilly.
They would have helped Britain alot, but it seems they didn't need them.
 
 
Thanks Milf.

I did not say nor did I mean to imply that the Irish people were or are anti British. I've had many enjoyable holidays in Ireland and always been made most welcome.

I said the Irish Government at the time hoped Germany would win, but for obvious reasons maintained a policy of neutrality.

My father was in the Belfast blitz and told me the story about the Dublin fire brigade coming up to help the local fire fighters. I always thought that a significant story.

But you said Dublin was bombed....who by and when?

As you point out the history of Ireland is complicated and bloody. Thats why I think the 1997 Belfast Agreement so significant.
 
 
 
But you said Dublin was bombed....who by and when?

 

By the Germans, in May 1941

 Dublin, North Strand Bombing 
 
 
 
 
Auxiliary Fire Service, Dundrum, 1940s.

On the night of May 30/31st, 1941, a 500-pound bomb dropped by an apparently off-course German bomber plan landed on the North Strand area of Dublin, killing 38 peopl, injuring 90 and destroying 70 of the small terraced houses of that area. Two smaller, 25-pound bombs fell on other parts of the north inner city and ras an hachtarin, the then residence of President Douglas Hyde, and the American Embassy which is close by, were damaged by a 250-bomb that dropped on the Phoenix Park. The Auxiliary Fire Service, which was set up in the 'emergency' of the second world war saw its "finest hour" that night, dealing with the unexpected attack on the neutral city. It was claimed as an accident - the planes were apparently off course and mistook Dublin for a British city. The German government later made an official apology and in 1958 paid 327,000 in compensation.
 
 Source 
 
 
thanks Walter. Sometimes I feel I dont actually have to ask a question before you supply the answer.  

Well at least Germany recognised it as a mistake and apologised.

Milf, did De Valera ever apologise or give a reason for signing the book of condolences for Adolf Hitler?
 
 
from  http://www.pearsecom.com/Ireland/anniversaries/March%208th,%201966%20-%20Nelson%27s%20Pillar%20Blown%20Up.htm 

quote

"Nelson's Pillar in Dublin actually predated the Column in Trafalgar Square, London. Its foundation stone was laid on February 15, 1808, and for 158 years it towered above O'Connell Street, surviving the Rising of 1916, when it was used as target practice by rebels in the GPO, and more than one battle of the war of independence and Civil War. The Free State gave way to the Republic and this last bastion of British imperialism remained, fondly thought of by Dubs without much consideration of the man it commemorates. Going up the stairs to the observation platform to view the city from on high was a popular pastime, and all the trams from various parts of Dublin terminated at The Pillar. Tram lines were replaced by bus lanes and it seemed destined to remain forever as a landmark of Dublin. Then, just after 2am on March 8, 1966, an explosion toppled the upper half of the pillar, leaving the statue in pieces strewn across the street. The dangerous remaining stump was safely blown up by army engineers and the plinth was eventually removed. The head of the statue, battered and unrecognisable, is in the Civic Museum. Arguments raged for decades after as to what, if anything, should replace it, and only in recent years did the Dublin Spire settle the dispute. When the foundations were excavated, a plaque and a time capsule box were found beneath it. Despite the fact that it WAS a reminder of British imperialism in Ireland, Dublin people did seem fond of the old Admiral, and the destruction of the pillar did seem a little pointless in many ways, but where would we be without symbolic gestures, and after all, we have the spire now, making the ultimate symbolic gesture to that old imperialism."

AND I'M WILLING TO TAKE A BET THAT I'M THE ONLY PERSON ON A2K TO HAVE BEEN UP IT (before it was blown up, dont be silly at the back....)
 
 
Dumb IRA blew the shit outta it.. Well before my time.. No a British victory was what the people here hoped for.. Ireland did, not anymore, relie on Britain for most of it's supplies.. De Valera once attempted several trade wars and was economically defeated by the British every time. Nope he didn't, it was basically giving the finger to Churchill and solidifying our statement of neutrality.. Face it the Irish wanted Britain to win.. We needed Britain to win..

De Valera inposed heavy measures to clamp down on IRA activity and German spies hoping for a rebellion here. The Catholic Church here was strongly anti-German and since the vast majority (70%+) of Citizens were church going Catholics, they stood by the bishops in the condemnation of War Crimes by Nazis.

Arn't you going to give up... We were pro-Allied despite being neutral.

BY THE WAY THE SPIRE IS THE BIGGEST WASTE OF METAL IN EUROPE.. ITS A BLACKENED PIECE OF METAL THAT PISSES OFF ANY DUBLINER THERE IS!!!
 
 
Well if I knew what it was, I'm sure I'd agree.
 
 
It's a large piece of metal that the government placed on the site of where Nelson's Column used to be. Waste of Metal, Money and Labour.... Biggest load of rubbish in the EU... No wonder we were voted dirtiest capital in the EU.

Here is the crappy thing itself...
 
It's either pollution or some crappy 'Celtic' Design that failed...

 
At night

 
During rush Hour
 
 
thanks but what is it?

flagpole?

Dubliners giving the finger to the rest of the world?
 
 
well i dunno what the fuck it is... i believe they built it cos we have no world famous landmarks... a large pint of guiness would have satisfied me..
 
 
Hitler could have won if..
After the defeat of France in the summer of 1940, Hitler's principal error at that time was not to take on France as an ally. Once France had fallen, rather than occupation, if, like the allies, with Germany after 1945, France had then been given it's independence conditional on an alliance with Germany, hundreds of thousand of German troops would have then been free to be deployed elsewhere as, and when, required. Belgium could have been broken up, with the French speaking area given to France, and the Flemish area absorbed into a greater Germanic homeland, incorporating Holland, Denmark and Norway, and eventually, Sweden.

The occupation of Sweden as a 1940/41 campaign would have been far more immediately useful for Swedish iron and copper resources. Moreover, the establishment of industrial facilities in the Baltic would have been considerably more difficult to attack than those in the Ruhr. With France being allowed to build up it's naval and air power, a joint attack on England in the spring of 1941 with the Reich would have been infinitely more successful, with the French taking control of southern Britain, and Germany absorbing the North. The occupation of England was not really important for Hitler, but more so for the French. Germany only needed the Brits out of the war and the naval facilities offered in Scotland. The Scots would have been repatriated back to Ireland from where they supposedly originally came, and thus creating a neutral United Ireland. The French, despite their previous alliance with Britain would have been more than willing to give the Brits a good kicking, ending hundreds of years of humiliation.

German and French forces in North Africa, combined with Italian, would have made easy work of the British North African Empire, and eventually securing Suez and middle east oil resouces. A joint German-French attack on Britain in the Spring of 1941 would have seen off Churchill before any useful links could have been established with the US, and before any planned attack on Pearl Harbour. A combined German-French-Italian, and possibly Spanish (with Britain out of the war) attack on the western Soviet Union, I am sure would have easily defeated the relatively weak and disorganised Soviet forces from May 1941, as planned. The Spanish would have Gibraltar back - how small things can please the many! Argentina, with its vast grain producing areas would have the Malvinas. The defeat of Britain, with French military assistance could have been achieved within 3 weeks, with a 15 mile a day progression.

What then follows, is a prospect of a pan-European war against the US-Canada alliance at some point in the future, with Japan attacking in the Pacific. German technological know how, with newly aquired Russian resources and French/Spanish/Italian back-up almost certainly could have brought the US to its knees. We would then have a German dominated European alliance with North America as the true "Living Space" desired by Hitler. In the Pacific, Japan would have aquired Australia as their "Living Space" With much of the Americas in its wake, Russia, and large areas of eastern and northern Europe, Germany would have truly dominated the world. France, Spain and Italy would have carved up Africa between them from the remains of the British Empire, like feeding off a giant Anglo-dinosaur, the world would begin anew.
 
 
well the reason why the french lost the war was because of a 'defeatist' complex in all of its levels.. and the maginox line made them feel safe.. france would not have fought britain nor being strong enough after its collapse to damage britain... germany plain and simple lost the war because of hitler and his 'stupid' desisions... well in the advent of an axis victory, i could see a german - japan war.. they couldnt have got along and germany and japan both wanted india..
 
 
Welcome to a2k erickson.

Interesting picture you paint there. But I dont think it was ever a possibility that France would become an ally of Germany and attack Britain. Thousands of French had just been evacuated to England along with the BEF from Dunkerque. Many more thousands were taken prisoner or just went home. France was militarily defeated (again) by Germany. Do you really think they would have said "OK Adolf you win now we will help you to conquer the rest of Europe" ?

Just supposing Hitler did raise a French army against Britain. There was still the Free French government of de Gaulle in London, and then there was the little matter of actually getting to London to capture him. 'Operation Sealion' was half hearted at best. The task of getting thousands of troops across the Channel with the RAF and Royal navy not yet defeated was daunting. Moreover there was not the same atmosphere of defeatism in Britain that prevailed in France. The people generally were inspired by Churchill. There were some of course notably Halifax, who thought after the fall of France that the sensible thing was to do a deal with Hitler (and you can see why). But churchill would have none of it. After a cabinet meeting in (I think) June 1940 he said simply and forcibly...we fight on whatever it takes. Government ministers banged their fists on the table with roars of approval. There was no talk of doing deals after that. We would have fought like furies against German invaders and their treacherous French allies (our former friends). We might not have won, but then we got Hitler to think the same thing.
 
 
to quote Churchill "all I have to offer is blood, sweat and tears."
 
 
had Hitler won, etc
Steve thanks for the welcome, and of course everything here is said in a speculative manner; if this, should that, and so on. The point again is that it would have been 'possible' for Hitler, once having defeated the French to have immediately offered them a peace treaty "with honour", allowing the complete removal of German troops and freeing all captured French soldiers, offering a "re-construction package" (similar to Marshal Plan) albeit on a much smaller scale, and the protection of French overseas Empire in Africa (the far East would have problematic due to insufficent logistics for that type of operation and would have clashed with Japan).

The downside would have an imediate decleration of war against its former ally, Britain (as with Italy against Germany in 1943), and the combined use of French Naval (fairly considerable) forces in the North Atlantic with the German fleet, and in the Med with the Italians. This type of alliance would have been far more sensible one than that with Britain, as they had been juggling for power for centuries, in fact the only 'true' ally Britain could have had in Europe - one that had never (WW1 outstanding) been a territorial competitor, was Germany. The imposition of a National Socialist/Fascist government in France would have been no more difficult than that of, say Norway. It is all a matter of proportion and effort. In this role, though Hitler was not really that type of RealPolitiK type man, and couldn't see beyond his own personal, fixed ambitions.

When discussing "what ifs" we make an awful lot of assumptions about the behaviour of people and nations. One could just have easily argued that for Hitler to have won, a sniper's bullet or poison cocktail could have seen off Churchill, and for Britain probably, as you say under Halifax, to have sued for peace. In that context the US would never had need or request to get involved in Europe, and all such aid from the US, Canada and Britain to the Soviet Union,, simply would never have happened. A Reich-Allies attack on the Communist state, with no prospect of US involvement, I am sure would have been a virtual given success. In fact, I suspect that Stalin would have been "bopped-off" and a newish possible peace settlement surrendering the Soviet West of the Urals may well have been signed.

Then again, had Franz Ferdinand never been shot, Hitler would have.....?
 
 
well as you say eric, a lot of "what ifs" there  

A lot of people wonder what if hitler had done this or not done that. Hitler was not stupid but was imo a complete sh1t.

He started the war, prolonged it unnecessarily and finally, from the German point of view lost it. I dont think it was a question of Hitler being smarter. I think if Hitler had been more reasonable, less carried away with his own rhetoric, then the war outcome could have been much more favorable to Germany. But Hitler and the nazis were not like that were they?
 
 
well wasnt the french navy destroyed by the british as a procaution... i personally believe the soviets never would have stopped bringing it to germany, and if french troops would fight in russia, they would most likely be used as 'fodder' to cover German flanks (ie. the Rumanians at Stalingrad)..

anyway the germans 'raped' france during the war... germany used the majority of her resourses to fuel their war effort and her manpower to build her weapons.. i dont think france would have been willing to fight whatsoever.....
 
 
 
well wasnt the french navy destroyed by the british as a procaution....
 

The Royal Navy attacked the French Navy at Mers El Kbir and Dakar.
(Actually, the French navy wanted to keep on the fight versus the Germans.)
 
 
an assassination attempt on stalins life wouldnt of hurt a few days before the barbarossa.. a lack of leadership could have tipped the balance at the start of the russia campaign..
 
 
Yeah i thought maybe that hitler could of won but if that is the answer then i would believe that would be right.I am German a little though.and thinkng about the past is horrible
 
 
as am i.. ive a trickle of german blood in me aswell..
 
 
Let's repatriate the entire world population to Africa from whence they supposedly originally came.

I distrust those who dream of a Germanic homeland, even today.
 
 
well to be honest, after both world wars germany's borders were doctored pretty badly... poland has for conturies being moving ever more west...
 
 
 
I distrust those who dream of a Germanic homeland, even today.
 

I dont understand what you mean by this. Is a German not entitled to dream of Germany as a Frenchman dreams of France or a Finnish man dreams of Finland?
 
 
Finns dream of a homeland less remote and cold, but are resigned to their lot in life...
 
 
 
I distrust those who dream of a Germanic homeland, even today.
 

Well, my local newspaper is called "The Patriot" - but that's due to 1948, when it was founded.

I am a European, but nevertheless Germany is my homeland (although I admittingly don't dream about it).
 
 
 
Finns dream of a homeland less remote and cold, but are resigned to their lot in life...
 

 
 
 
well many of my fellow citizens dream of a united ireland.. but it seems rather unlikely at the mo..
 
 
they only have to vote for it
 
 
well that would be still a long time off... it would require a majority on both sides... there is sweet irony bout the north.. in 1921, one of the main reasons why Carson wanted the north to be seperate from the south was its economy and industry was far ahead of the south.. it took the south over 50 years to catch up with the north,
em... but now we are vastly richer than the north... industry has fled the north due to the 'troubles'.. it has been suggested that we wouldnt be able to affort reunionifying the country.. well the only thing they have better than the south is their road system which till now was vastly superior to our system..

here is an interesting thought.. if de valera joined the war for the british, he could have unified the island with churchills blessing in return for helping the british and regardless, if they won or lost the war, a future occupation by say germany, would incorperate the island into one zone cos the island isnt too big.. either way, unifactation of some sorts has occured..

Lastly, to add to my verbal diarrioah, what if hitler managed to bring Spain under Franco into the war on his side.. the loss of Gibraltar would have been a devestating loss to britains effort in the meditteranian! no?
 
 
The Nazis made overtures to deValera and other Irish leaders, trying to induce them to join Germany against the Brits in return for a united homeland. The Irish had better sense and didn't buy it. They suspected that the Allies would win in the end and the old Erin would really get it in the neck then for having been an enemy ally.

The Iberian peninsula -- Spain and Portugal both -- stayed neutral with the blessings of both the Allies and the Axis. It was handy place for clandestine operations. I've heard it said that if you sat at a sidewalk cafe in Lisbon in 1943-44, you were guaranteed to be sitting among mostly spies and secret agents from both sides. That's where secret deals were made and much disinformation planted.
 
 
Early in the war, Winnie tabled a plan to seize the Irish Channel ports, and his cabinet reacted with horror. The military discreetly pointed out to him that they'd been thrown off the continent and weren't certain of being able to resist the Germans if they managed to effect a landing on the Kentish coast--the last thing they needed was to stir up a hornet's nest. The old Imperial Lion, i suspect, was just rankled that he couldn't treat Ireland as though it were private, Royal property...
 
 
They were hardly Irish "Channel" ports Set. And I'm not sure if they were Irish or legally still British territory. But anyway we wanted to use Queenstown and another naval base (forgotten name) to protect shipping in the western approaches. Churchill even offered de Valera sovereignty over N Ireland in exchange which was refused.
 
 
I don't believe the 1922 settlement left the English sovereign over ports in the Republic, although you may be correct in that. I'd have to look it up.
 
 
Apparently he was blind for a few months while we were at war.
 
 
now there's a funny thing

decided to try and find out a bit more on the Irish naval bases we wanted to use by typing sovereignty N Ireland Queenstown etc into Google...and was immediately directed back to this thread.

Some bloke called steve 41oo keeps twittering on about it. Another bloke called Setanta...

What do they know eh?
 
 
You know, Steve, i would not have considered ports in Ulster to have been "channel ports"--so we misunderstood one another. I was referring to Waterford, Youghal and Cork, and i believe it was to those ports that WSC was referring.
 
 
They seized Iceland so doing the same for southern Ireland was not beyond the realm of possibility. Given the situation in 1940 I think Churchill regarded Irish neutrality as a offensive not defensive position.
 
 
Iceland was likely rather charmed by the arrival of the U.S. Marines, given that drunkenness was the most popular indoor sport there at that time. Seizing the Irish channel ports, however, would have entailed a much larger and more dangerous military committment. Even had Eire remained quiescent, the population surely wouldn't have done, and there were many veterans of the "flying brigades" of the 1922-33 civil war on hand to give the English a warm welcome...
 
 
 
You know, Steve, i would not have considered ports in Ulster to have been "channel ports"--so we misunderstood one another. I was referring to Waterford, Youghal and Cork, and i believe it was to those ports that WSC was referring.
 

well so was I actually. Queenstown being at or near Cork.

I only mentioned N Ireland in context of the sovereignty deal between Churchill and de Valera...

confusion on confusion  
 
 
Renamed Cobh now... all you Brits seem to think that were completely anti-Allied and pro-German.. we would have resisted any occupier as any nation would... personally i believe we should have joined the war, or at least helped the Allied nations more than we did (and yes we helped britian a long way),
staying out of the war was a mistake.. we had nothing to lose and we would have benefitted more with an alliance with the british than trying to play our neutrality.. if britain was allowed the treaty ports and if she had built air bases in kerry and donegal, the battle of the atlantic would have been easier for the britain as their arial patrols would have covered a few more hundred miles of ocean.. cornwall vulnerable.. it makes alot more sense for the germans to have invaded across the pas-de-calais... What if Sealion went ahead despite the success of the battle of britain? would germany have succeeded?
 
 
I personally think it was too late by the time the "Battle of Britain" had begun. Could the fallschirmjeagers been used to establish a bridgehead in Kent, i think the German Navy could have protected a crossing. Gniesenau, Scharnhorst and Prinz Eugen ran the channel in broad daylight--Adolf Galland describes the operation in his The First and the Last, his war memoirs. He states that he kept fifty fighters over the flotilla at all times. It would only have been necessary to keep the narrowest portion of the channel open for a day--and Kesselring, Sperrle and Stumpff disposed of far more resources in 1940 than Galland had available for his operation in February, 1942. Churchill himself, in his monumental history of the Second World War, admits that the island was almost defenseless after the debacle on the continent. Approximately 330,000 troops--English, French and Belgian--were evacuated in the Dunkirk operation, and they arrived in England without weapons and equipment. The "territorial divisions" which were organized for defense were similarly ill- or unequipped. However, the German paratroops were not yet prepared for such an operation, what resources had been available had been used in the drive through Holland and Belgium, and were not even then available in large numbers--although they likely would have met little opposition if landed in Kent. The other limiting factor was transport. Although Sea Lion had been planned for a long time, OKH had not given it sufficient serious consideration to have marshalled the resources which would have been needed. Hitler was an idiot, militarily speaking, as i've noted time and again in this thread, and the too many Hitler threads we get at this site. He thought that England would fold up as he deluded himself that Poland and France had done. In Poland and France, neither government was prepared or willing to fight an all-out war, but in both cases, individual units fought heroically. French armor was superior to German armor, but was not concentrated. Polish airman hadn't the aircraft to successfully oppose the Germans, but they did great service to the RAF once they arrived in England. The French front-line aircraft were a match for the Germans, but, as with armor, they were squandered by being scatte4red about the country, and not concentrated to oppose the onslaught a child could have foreseen.

Interesting topic, but as with almost all historical "might-have-beens," it ignores that events transpired as they did because of the operative conditions at the time.
 
 
I bet I'm the only person on a2k to have met Adolf Galland  

(at North Weald former RAF base maybe 20 years ago. He was given vip treatment...)

Set I'm always in awe of your mastery of historical detail. When Walter H came over here (hope he doesnt mind me recounting this) he said his father who was a doctor with the werhmact thought operation Sealion to be a disaster in the making.

I used to think that Hitler only had to make overtures to Britain and some deal could be done. But he did (Hess etc.) and was thoroughly rebuffed. After the fall of France, Churchill squashed any thoughts (in his cabinet) of negotiated peace, and he carried the people with him. Had the Germans made a landing in S England we would have fought like furies...with sticks if necessary. (we like fighting)

Milf I dont think all Irish were anti allied or British far from it. (Although I could understand it given the history). I just think de Valera made a calculated guess that Germany would win (and who could blame him).
 
 
 
When Walter H came over here (hope he doesnt mind me recounting this) he said his father who was a doctor with the werhmact thought operation Sealion to be a disaster in the making.
 

At that time, my father still was a wireless operator and paramedic.
The first time, they went with was a kind of landing boat - near enough to take photos. (I've seen two pics, with - using some phantasy - the white cliffs of Dover in the background - have really to try to find them again.... some time.) My father always said, they didn't take a 'landing' serious, more like a maneuver/exercise. So, he even didn't take his full first aid equipment with him, when going the second time, only empty boxes. [Before that, he had been around Leningrad, at the doors of Moscow - commanding a paramedic tank: he said, he knew, how Nazi Wehrmacht worked.]
 
 
thanks walter and apologies for errors in my re telling of your story.

What is a paramedic tank?
 
 
Steve, our member Asherman has also met General Galland...
 
 
oh dear bluff called

never actually shook hands or exchanged war medals

just saw the famed war hero at 10 paces

but it was HIM
 
 
If you have not read The First and the Last, i highly recommend it. Asherman says that he did the "meet and greet" thing, and that Galland was cordial, affable and charming. I'm sure he made good money on the rubber chicken circuit, the more so as his well-known acrimonious relations with Hitler made him less objectionable to governments and veterans.
 
 
 
What is a paramedic tank?
 

An armoured ambulance should be the correct translation.
 
 
here is an interesting one, what if hitler had died, say in August 1939.. would have the reich survived and would his successor have been as keen on war...
 
 
In my opinion, Hitler was indeed smart. His problem was that his hatred for the Jews and Slavs, along with his belief that he was some sort of God, caused him to make three decisions that turned the tide of the war.

Until the middle of 1940, his strategy (or his generals strategies) were nearly flawless. He gained amazing victories in western Europe. But, after he had pushed the English off the mainland of the continent, then he made three decisions.

First, he chose to begin putting Jews, gypsies, Slavs, mentally ill and physically deformed people, along with many other "undesirables" into deathcamps. This was a great mistake. We could look at him making two different decisions on this subject.
The best decision to make - and one he wouldn't have ever made, regardless of the benefits of it - would be to let them live. Think of how many more scientists Germany would have had. Think of how many more soldiers they would have had. There would have been other benefits to this decision, but I don't think it's necessary to dwell on them. This would never have happened with Hitler's racist views.
Another decision to make, better than that which he did, would be to have just killed them on the spot, or exiled them. The manner that he disposed of them costed him far too much money, and far too much men that could have been used for the war.

Second, he chose to break the Non-Aggression Pact that he had with the Soviet Union. This was probably the greatest mistake of the war. This was a war, from the start, that he could not have won, given his current positions. At the very best it could have been a stalemate. So say he didn't declare war. He would have been able to concentrate his men and money on other things, such as North Africa.

Lastly, he chose to wage an air war with Britain. This wasn't that bad of a decision, but it wasn't necessary. His choice to begin bombing non military targets was, however, a bad decision. I believe, if he had concentrated solely on the defense of the new Nazi Empire, and the expansion into North Africa, he would have been much more successful.
If he had achieved victory in Egypt, and taken the Suez Canal, then he would have cut the British off from the Mediterranean, making it a German/Italian lake. That would open the door to unlimited oil in the Middle East, which he could have taken quite easily. Once he had defeated the British here, I don't think they would have been much of a threat. They were completely isolated.

So yes, I believe Hitler had the world in his grasp. Just a few things he could have easily done would have changed history. Maybe he wasn't the greatest strategist, but he had generals who were. And he had the power to say what general he would go with.

But these are my views... I don't know how many others share them with me.
 
 
thanks Alexander and welcome to a2k

ever thought of writing a book about Hitler?
 
 
Actually I have thought about it, hah.
 
 
my theroy
Hello everyone i am only 15, not fan of war except the games on the computer. but a while ago my friend and i were talking about this topic about "What if Hitler" right. so i came to a conclusion in a simple diagram.
 hitlers positon 
if you have a look at this you would be like WTF?, but allow me to explain.
you see the semicircle it is represented by the portion of europe that hitler occupied during WW2 and all his forces untill the point were he hadn't yet invaded africa or USSR,
Now if Hitler wanted to occupy more space he would have to get more forces, but forces from where?? the graves or the soldiers he already wasted away.... not likely, even with the sworen arms of the countries he took over.
Now up to this point he owned most of europe, about to head into africa. STOP!!! why invade africa?? they are/were 3rd world countries it is juz a waste of good forces and it only provaked the english more and more, i say if Rommel's Africa Korps was put to look atfer the west and southern coast of europe or/and to plan some 2nd air invasion of england or even a troop invasion via the water, considering that Hitler and the soviets had some peace agreement (i forget the name), so it is cool with the USSR wateva hitler does aslong as they dont attack them, but what does hitler the absolute dickhead do! he attack's them. So even IF he took over USSR what was he going to occupy it with? a huge long wall? sorry thats in China. which brings me back to that picture, how can you expand if you have nothing to make it bigger while forces are pushing it inwards making them smaller, and making all his forces fatter wouldn't help at all. so i say if hitler was to think about this logicaly he could have own alot of europe and not get in alot of trouble for it.
As for his advantages, his tanks were masterful, the weapons were good, and the intent was high, but he got gready and lost it all even his life.
Now think about this yourself, would you attack a country to be gready but then loose your life, wife Eva braun (mysterey) and all what you worked for soon after,
Or would you be happy with your life, as much land as the eye can see and a wife and your millions of dollars from his dictatorship.
Personally i would go for the 2nd one.

Thanx for reading my very 1st post on this site, you might find alot of flaws in all that, but then think to yourself i'm juz some average 15yr old with a opinion.
I look forward to your replies
 
 
If Shitler hadn't antagonized Britain and France by annexing the Sudetenland and Austria, then he might have gotten away with the division of Poland with Stalin. This would then have enabled him to pursue his goal of acquiring "lebensraum" without having a western front to think about.

This was his key mistake IMO, because the territories of German-speaking populations in central Europe were of no strategical importance to him at that time and forced the British and French to view him as a threat to their interests in their own backyard.

Chances are that in the eyes of Britain and France Shitler and Stalin would both have been considered equally bad guys and equally guilty of what had happened to Poland if it had not been for the annexation of the Sudetenland and Austria.

After the conquest of Poland and with no logistical issues of dealing with the occupation of France and a bunch of other European countries of little/no importance to his final goal of conquering Ukraine and the Caucasus, he could have attacked the Soviet Union earlier or at the same time but with more resources available for that operation.

Stalin, with no or little support from Britain, France and the USA, in the face of an imminent military disaster might have sued for peace and accepted the loss of Ukraine and the Caucasus...
 
 
Apparently, then, you think that England and France would not have honored their mutual defense pact with Poland.
 
 
I think Wise Guy has it exactly backwards. Chamberlain was quite ready to tolerate the takeover of the Sudentenland and, particularly, of Austria. Both were German-speaking territoties anyway so Hitler could make a half-arsed argument that Germany was doing no more than retreiving lost territories. It was precisely the invasion of Poland which precipitated a declaration of war from Poland's allies, Britain and France. WG, are you suggesting that if Hitler had hit Poland right away, without bothering about the German-speaking lands, nobody would have interfered? That's a tough argument to take seriously.
 
 
 
Apparently, then, you think that England and France would not have honored their mutual defense pact with Poland.
 
I think its clear the defence treaty with poland was a line in the sand. Only H. Hitler thought it meant nothing. Actually in practical terms he was right, apart from it precipitating WW2. I saw again tonight a film by Jeremy Isaacs on the siege of Lennigrad and the defence of the Russian homeland. I must confess it brought a tear to my eye.
 
 
Whenever someone suggests that Hitler was "smart," i can only shake my head at the thought that he's taken in yet someone else more than 60 years after he died. Now, i acknowledge that Wise Guy has not described Hitler as smart, but the joker at the top this page (page 24) has said as much. So i thought i'd dispense with him first. I'm not going into a detailed response to his post, i'm frankly sick and tired of doing this year after year.

But Wise Guy is much mistaken. As MA points out, it is almost incredible how very backwards WG has gotten it.

Hitler was a gutter politician, the only talent he ever displayed in his life. His tools were bluster, intimidation and murder. He could murder the homosexual leadership of the S.A., confident that no one would weep for them, or seek to avenge them. He could bluster his way into political popularity, exploiting the Versailles Diktat myth (which he didn't create) and the Stab in the Back myth (which he didn't create), and harping upon the shame of the Germans at their defeat, promising that Germany would rise to a greatness they had never known before--and the Germans ate it up. And he thought he could intimidate France and England.

Daladier and France did not want to face Hitler alone, and there was sufficient antisemitism and admiration for fascism in France that Daladier (with a shakey left-wing coalition) would prefer not to antagonize the French conservatives, but he had no illusions about Hitler's ambitions. Because Neville Chamberlain wanted to negotiate with Hitler over Czechoslovakia, Daladier went along, because he felt that France could not face Germany alone. But he said: "Today it is the turn of Czechoslovakia. Tomorrow it will be the turn of Poland and Romania. When Germany has obtained the oil and wheat it needs, she will turn on the West. Certainly we must multiply our efforts to avoid war. But that will not be obtained unless Great Britain and France stick together, intervening in Prague for new concessions but declaring at the same time that they will safeguard the independence of Czechoslovakia. If, on the contrary, the Western Powers capitulate again they will only precipitate the war they wish to avoid." (source in Shirer's Collapse of the Third Republic )

So Hitler was confirmed in his belief that he could intimidate the western powers to get what he wanted. Had the English backed his play, Daladier was prepared to honor the military assistance pact which France had with Czechoslovakia, but France did not intend to go it alone. Sartre reports that when Daladier returned to Paris and was hailed by the population, he told his aide, Lger, "Ah, les cons!" (Which means, "Ah, the turds," in sense that an English speaker would say "sh*thead.")

So Hitler, who wanted to believe it anyway, convinced himself that he had successfully intimidated the English and the French. In fact, he had only intimidated Neville Chamberlain, who, despite his family's origins, had been raised in the classic style of the English gentleman, and was fool enough to believe that Hitler would keep his word, and honor his agreements. He was obliged to acknowledge that he had been a fool when Germany, Italy, Hungary and Poland gobbled up the rest of Czechoslovakia in 1939. Hitler considered Daladier a coward, but Daladier had wanted to oppose him, but was unwilling to face Germany alone. Hitler considered Chamberlain a coward, and certainly Chamberlain had been a fool, but Hitler was too stupid to see that Chamberlain was not supported by even his own cabinet, especially after the dismemberment of Czechoslovakia in 1939. Although Chamberlain attempted to prevent general war, even after the invasion of Poland, Hitler had badly misjudged Daladier and the French, and he had badly misjudged the English. Daladier said that he would fight on, but his government fell over his failure to aid the Finns in the Winter War.

Chamberlain was forced by circumstance to support a war against Germany, and did almost nothing. He did take Churchill into the government as First Lord of the Admiralty, but Churchill's aggressive nature benefited Churchill, and not Chamberlain. When the attempt to defend Norway proved a fiasco, Chamberlain finally could not keep a government together. He attempted to form an all-party coalition, but Labour balked, and his own backbenchers were deserting him. His friend an political ally Leo Amery publicly told him: "For God's sake, go!" While he was negotiating to form a national government in May, 1940, Germany invaded the low countries. Labour finally agreed to serve in a national government under "someone else" (although it is not clear that they would have done so if they had known that Churchill would be the choice), and Chamberlain was finished.

Hitler could only see other leaders in terms of the gutter politics he understood. He thought Daladier was a coward, and he was not, and he (Daladier) would not back down once the French were committed to war over the invasion of Poland. He thought Chamberlain was a coward--although that was not true, it was enough that Chamberlain failed to deal effectively with Hitler. But Churchill was certainly no coward, and Hitler completely failed to understand that the English could cast about for a government who would fight him until they found one--Hitler could not understand a government which bowed to the will of the people, and he could not understand just how odious he was to the English, and just how far they would go to defeat him. More than anything else, Hitler was always deluded by believing what he wished to believe as opposed to coming to an understanding of the evidence of events an the implication of those events for his nation and his policies.

To suggest that had Hitler not annexed Austria and dismembered Czechoslovakia, but simply proceeded to an invasion of Poland (for which he was definitely not prepared in 1938), that the western allies would not have responded is foolish. It was the invasion of Poland which hardened Daladier's resolve to fight Germany, and it was the invasion of Poland which destroyed Chamberlain's support, even within his own party. All of Europe understood that an invasion of Poland would lead to general war, and Daladier has absolutely no illusions about what Hitler intended. He couldn't get the French to back him over Czechoslovakia, but he was prepared to fight over Poland. Sadly for Poland, Chamberlain's continued dithering lead to an inexcusable inaction on the part of England and France in the crucial period when and invasion of Germany from the west would have met no more than token resistance. Hitler had judged that the western allies were cowards, and would not attack him while he was involved in Poland. He was correct that he could get away with that invasion, but for the wrong reasons. He simply did not understand what he had unleashed, and ultimately, millions of Germans, and tens of millions of others paid the price.
 
 
 
I think Wise Guy has it exactly backwards. Chamberlain was quite ready to tolerate the takeover of the Sudentenland and, particularly, of Austria. Both were German-speaking territoties anyway so Hitler could make a half-arsed argument that Germany was doing no more than retreiving lost territories. It was precisely the invasion of Poland which precipitated a declaration of war from Poland's allies, Britain and France. WG, are you suggesting that if Hitler had hit Poland right away, without bothering about the German-speaking lands, nobody would have interfered? That's a tough argument to take seriously.
 

Basically, what I was suggesting was that in terms of his final goal the Rheinland, the Sudetenland and Austria meant nothing. Those territories had only a meaning if he was content with restoring Germany's position prior to WW1. But he wanted to make Germany the no 1 power in Europe and possibly in the world and this would have been possible only if he had taken Ukraine and the Caucasus which would have seriously crippled the Soviet Union's resources while immensely boosting Germany's resources. Poland was the only obstacle between Germany and the Soviet Union that had to be taken care of in order for such a plan to be executed. Now, whether or not he could have succeeded at all is an entirely different matter. I'm just saying that he did his best to waste resources and to intimidate France and Britain prior to making the move that triggered WW2, i.e. the invasion of Poland...
 
 
